Utah, session 2026, HB65.
Section 1. Section 15A-2-103 is amended to read:15A-2-103Effective 07/01/26. Specific editions adopted of construction code of a nationally recognized code authority.(1)Subject to the other provisions of this part, the following construction codes are incorporated by reference, and together with the amendments specified in Chapter 3, Statewide Amendments Incorporated as Part of State Construction Code, and Chapter 4, Local Amendments Incorporated as Part of State Construction Code, are the construction standards to be applied to building construction, alteration, remodeling, and repair, and in the regulation of building construction, alteration, remodeling, and repair in the state:(a)the 20212024 edition of the International Building Code, including Appendices C and J, issued by the International Code Council;(b)the 2021 edition of the International Residential Code, issued by the International Code Council;(c)Appendix AQ of the 2021 edition of the International Residential Code, issued by the International Code Council;(d)the 20212024 edition of the International Plumbing Code, issued by the International Code Council;(e)the 20212024 edition of the International Mechanical Code, issued by the International Code Council;(f)the 20212024 edition of the International Fuel Gas Code, issued by the International Code Council;(g)the 2023 edition of the National Electrical Code, issued by the National Fire Protection Association;(h)the 20212024 edition of the International Energy Conservation Code, issued by the International Code Council;(i)the 20212024 edition of the International Existing Building Code, issued by the International Code Council;(j)subject to Subsection 15A-2-104(2), the HUD Code;(k)subject to Subsection 15A-2-104(1), Appendix AE of the 2021 edition of the International Residential Code, issued by the International Code Council;(l)subject to Subsection 15A-2-104(1), the 2005 edition of the NFPA 225 Model Manufactured Home Installation Standard, issued by the National Fire Protection Association;(m)subject to Subsection (3), for standards and guidelines pertaining to plaster on a historic property, as defined in Section 9-8a-302, the U.S. Department of the Interior Secretary's Standards for Rehabilitation and Guidelines for Rehabilitating Historic Buildings;(n)the residential provisions of the 20212024 edition of the International Swimming Pool and Spa Code, issued by the International Code Council; and(o)Modular Building Institute Standards 1200 and 1205, issued by the International Code Council, except as modified by provisions of this title governing modular units.(2)Consistent with Title 65A, Chapter 8, Management of Forest Lands and Fire Control, the Legislature adopts the 2006 edition of the Utah Wildland Urban Interface Code, issued by the International Code Council, with the alternatives or amendments approved by the Utah Division of Forestry, Fire, and State Lands, as a construction code that may be adopted by a local compliance agency by local ordinance or other similar action as a local amendment to the codes listed in this section.(3)The standards and guidelines described in Subsection (1)(m) apply only if:(a)the owner of the historic property receives a government tax subsidy based on the property's status as a historic property;(b)the historic property is wholly or partially funded by public money; or(c)the historic property is owned by a government entity.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 15A-3-102 is amended to read:15A-3-102Effective 07/01/26. Amendments to Chapters 1 through 3 of IBC.(1)IBC, Section 106, is deleted.(2)In IBC, Section 110, a new section is added as follows:  " 110.3.13, Weather-resistant exterior wall envelope.  An inspection shall be made of the weather-resistant exterior wall envelope as required by Section 1404.2, and flashing as required by Section 1404.4 to prevent water from entering the weather-resistive barrier."(3)IBC, Section 115.1, is deleted and replaced with the following:  "115.1 Authority.  Whenever the building official finds any work regulated by this code being performed in a manner either contrary to the provisions of this code or other pertinent laws or ordinances or is dangerous or unsafe, the building official is authorized to stop work."(4)In IBC, Section 202, the following definition is added for Ambulatory Surgical Center:  "AMBULATORY SURGICAL CENTER.  A building or portion of a building licensed by the Department of Health and Human Services where procedures are performed that may render patients incapable of self preservation where care is less than 24 hours.  See Utah Administrative Code Utah Administrative Code, R432-13."(5)In IBC, Section 202, the definition for "ApprovedAPPROVED" is modified by adding the words "or independent third-party licensed engineer or architect and submitted to the building official" after the word "official."(6)In IBC, Section 202, the definition for "Approved AgencyAPPROVED AGENCY" is modified by deleting the words "where such agency has been approved by the building official."(7)In IBC, Section 202, the definition for "Approved FabricatorAPPROVED FABRICATOR" is modified by adding the words "or approved by the state of Utah or a licensed engineer" after the word "code."(8)In IBC, Section 202, the definition for "Approved SourceAPPROVED SOURCE" is modified by adding the words "or licensed engineer" after the word "official."(9)In IBC, Section 202, the following definition is added for Assisted Living Facility, Residential Treatment and Support:  "ASSISTED LIVING FACILITY, RESIDENTIAL TREATMENT AND SUPPORT. A residential facility that provides a group living environment for four or more residents licensed by the Department of Health and Human Services and provides a protected living arrangement for ambulatory, non-restrained persons who are capable of achieving mobility sufficient to exit the facility without the physical assistance of another person.ASSISTED LIVING FACILITY, TYPE I. A residential facility licensed by the Department of Health and Human Services that provides a protected living arrangement, assistance with activities of daily living, and social care to two or more ambulatory, non-restrained persons who are capable of mobility sufficient to exit the facility without the assistance of another person.ASSISTED LIVING FACILITY, TYPE II. A residential facility licensed by the Department of Health and Human Services that provides an array of coordinated supportive personal and health care services to two or more residents who are:(i)  Physically disabled but able to direct his or her own care; or(ii)  Cognitively impaired or physically disabled but able to evacuate from the facility, or to a zone or area of safety, with the physical assistance of one person.ASSISTED LIVING FACILITY, LIMITED CAPACITY. A Type I or Type II assisted living facility having two to five residents.ASSISTED LIVING FACILITY, SMALL. A Type I or Type II assisted living facility having six to sixteen residents.ASSISTED LIVING FACILITY, LARGE. A Type I or Type II assisted living facility having more than sixteen residents."(10)In IBC, Section 202, the following definition is added for ballistic glass:"BALLISTIC GLASS. Glass certified at a minimum level of:(i) Underwriters Laboratories Standard UL752-23, Standard for Bullet-Resisting Equipment, Threat Level UL-RF-E from Table C1 (Legacy Level 7) (2023); or(ii) ASTM F3279-24, Standard Test Method for Ballistic Resistant Security Glazing Materials, Threat and Performance Level 4, Ballistic Test Identity (BTI) R1-T1-C5-21 under Table 1, Ballistic Criteria (2021)."(11)In IBC, Section 202, the following definition is added for Child Care Facilitychild care facility: "CHILD CARE FACILITY. A facility where care and supervision is provided for fourfive or more children for less than 24 hours a day and for direct or indirect compensation in place of care ordinarily provided in their home."(11)(12)In IBC, Section 202, the definition for " [A] Record DrawingsRECORD DRAWINGS" is modified by deleting the words "a fire alarm system" and replacing them with "any fire protection system."(12)(13)In IBC, Section 202, the following definition is added for security glazing:"SECURITY GLAZING. A clear or tinted durable material applied to glass doors and windows that enhances the structural integrity of the glass by preventing it from shattering and falling to the ground when impacted by an object and meets the minimum standard established by:(i) ASTM F3561, Standard Test Method for Forced-Entry-Resistance of Fenestration Systems After Simulated Active Shooter Attack, minimum level 3 of Table 2, Potential Energy of Impactor and Drop Height (2023); or(ii) ANSI Z97.1-15(R20) American National Standard for safety glazing materials used in buildings safety performance specifications and methods of test, and shall meet the durability requirements of Sections 5.3 and 5.4."(14)In IBC, Section 304.1, the words "and technical colleges who also educate high school students as part of their student body" are added after the words "Educational occupancies for students above the 12th grade including higher education laboratories."(13)(15)In IBC, Section 305, Sections 305.2 through 305.2.3 are deleted and replaced with the following:"305.2 Group E, child day care facilities. This group includes buildings and structures or portions thereof occupied by fourfive or more children 2two years of age  old or older who receive educational, supervision, child care services or personal care services for fewer than 24 hours per day. See Section 429 Day Care, for special requirements for day care.305.2.1 Within places of religious worship. Rooms and spaces within places of religious worship providing such day care during religious functions shall be classified as part of the primary occupancy.305.2.2 Four or fewer children. A facility having four or fewer children receiving such day care shall be classified as part of the primary occupancy.305.2.3 Four or fewer children in a dwelling unit. A facility such as the above within a dwelling unit and having four or fewer children receiving such day care shall be classified as a Group R-3 occupancy or shall comply with the International Residential CodeChild day care facilities ancillary to the main occupancy. A facility where any number of children receive such day care may be classified as an accessory occupancy if the area complies with Section 508.2.305.2.4 Child day care -- residential child care certificate or a license. Areas used for child day care purposes with a residential child care certificate, as described in Utah Administrative Code, R430-50, Residential Certificate Child Care, or a residential child care license, as described in Utah Administrative Code, R430-90, Licensed Family Child Care, may be located in a Group R-2 or R-3 occupancy as provided in Sections 310.3 and 310.4 or shall comply with the International Residential Code in accordance with Section R101.2Four or fewer children in a dwelling unit. A facility such as the above within a dwelling unit and having four or fewer children receiving such day care shall be classified as a Group R-3 occupancy or shall comply with the International Residential Code.305.2.5 Child care centers. Each of the following areas may be classified as accessory occupancies, if the area complies with Section 508.2:1. Hourly child care center, as described in Utah Administrative Code, R381-60 Hourly Child Care Centers;2. Child care centers, as described in Utah Administrative Code, R381-100, Child Care Centers;3. Out-of-school-time programs, as described in Utah Administrative Code, R381-70, Out of School Time Child Care Programs; and4. Commercial preschools, as described in Utah Administrative Code, R381-40, Commercial Preschool Programs."Residential child day care. A residential certificate child care facility as described in Utah Administrative Code, R430-50, or a licensed family child care facility as described in Utah Administrative Code, R430-90, licensed by the Department of Health and Human Services shall be classified as a Group R-2 or R-3 occupancy, or shall comply with the International Residential Code."(14)(16)In IBC, Table 307.1(1), footnote "d" is added to the row for Explosives, Division 1.4G in the column titled STORAGE - Solid Pounds (cubic feet).(15)(17)In IBC, Section 308.2, in the list of items under "This group shall include," the words "Type-I Large and Type-II Small, see Section 308.2.5" are added after "Assisted living facilities."(16)(18)In IBC, Section 308.2.4, all of the words after the first International Residential Code are deleted.(17)(19)A new IBC, Section 308.2.5, is added as follows:"308.2.5 Assisted living facilities. A Type I, Large assisted living facility is classified as occupancy Group I-1, Condition 1. A Type II, Small assisted living facility is classified as occupancy Group I-1, Condition 2. See Section 202 for definitions."(18)(20)IBC, Section 308.3, is deleted and replaced with the following: "308.3 Institutional Group I-2. Institutional Group I-2 occupancy shall include buildings and structures used for medical care on a 24-hour basis for more than four persons who are incapable of self-preservation. This group shall include, but not be limited to the following:Assisted living facilities, Type-II Large, see Section 308.3.3Child care facilitiesFoster care facilitiesDetoxification facilitiesHospitalsNursing homes (both intermediate care facilities and skilled nursing facilities)Psychiatric hospitals"(19)(21)In IBC, Section 308.3.2, the number "five" is deleted and replaced with the number "four" in each locationall the wording following the word "Group" is deleted and replaced with the words "R-4 Condition 2.".(20)(22)A new IBC, Section 308.3.3, is added as follows:"308.3.3 Assisted living facilities. A Type-II, Large assisted living facility is classified as occupancy Group I-2, Condition 1. See Section 202 for definitions."(21)(23)In IBC, Section 308.5, the words "more than five" are deleted and replaced with the words "five or more in each location."(22)(24)IBC, Section 308.5.1, is deleted and replaced with the following:"308.5.1 Classification as Group E. A child day care facility that provides care for five or more but not more than 100 children under two years of age old, where the rooms in which the children are cared for are located on a level of exit discharge serving such rooms and each of these child care rooms has an exit door directly to the exterior, shall be classified as a Group E. See Section 429 for special requirements for Day Care."(23)(25)In IBC, SectionsSection 308.5.3 and 308.5.4, the words "five or fewer" are deleted and replaced with the words "four or fewer" in each location and the following sentence is added at the end:  "See Section 429 for special requirements for Day Care."(26)IBC, Section 308.5.4, is deleted and replaced with the following:"308.5.4 Child day care facilities ancillary to the main occupancy. A facility where any number of children receive such day care may be classified as an accessory occupancy if the area complies with Section 508.2."(27)A new IBC Section 308.5.5 is added as follows:"308.5.5 Four or fewer persons receiving care in a dwelling-unit. A facility such as the above within a dwelling unit and having four or fewer persons receiving custodial care shall be classified as a Group R-3 occupancy or shall comply with the International Residential Code."(24)(28)IBC, Section 310.4, is deleted and replaced with the following:"310.4 Residential Group R-3. Residential Group R-3 occupancies and single family dwellings complying with the International Residential Code where the occupants are primarily permanent in nature, are children receiving child day care services, and are not classified as Group R-1, R-2, R-4 or I, including:Assisted Living Facilities, Type-I, limited capacity, see Section 310.5.3Buildings that do not contain more than two dwellingsCare facilities, other than child care, that provide accommodations for five or fewer persons receiving careChild day care facilities having four or fewer children receiving care in a dwellingResidential child day care facilities licensed by the Utah Department of Health and Human Services as a:Residential certificate child care facilityLicensed family child care facilityCongregate living facilities (nontransient) with 16 or fewer occupantsBoarding houses (nontransient)ConventsDormitoriesFraternities and sororitiesMonasteriesCongregate living facilities (transient) with 10 or fewer occupantsBoarding houses (transient)Lodging houses (transient) with five or fewer guest rooms and 10 or fewer occupants"(25)(29)IBC, Section 310.4.1, is deleted and replaced with the following:"310.4.1 Care facilities within a dwelling. Care facilities, other than child care, for five or fewer persons receiving care that are within a single family dwelling are permitted to comply with the International Residential Code. See Section 429 for special requirements for Child Day Care."(26)(30)A new IBC Section 310.4.3 is added as follows:  " "310.4.3 Child Care.  Areas used for child care purposes may be located in a residential dwelling unit under all of the following conditions and Section 429:1.  Compliance with Utah Administrative Code, R710-8, Day Care Rules, as enacted under the authority of the Utah Fire Prevention Board.2.  Use is approved by the Department of Health and Human Services, as enacted under the authority of the Utah Code, Title 26B, Chapter 2, Part 4, Child Care Licensing, and in any of the following categories:a.  Utah Administrative Code, R430-50, Residential Certificate Child Care.b.  Utah Administrative Code, R430-90, Licensed Family Child Care.3.  Compliance with all zoning regulations of the local regulator."(27)(31)A new IBC, Section 310.4.4, is added as follows:  "310.4.4 Assisted living facilities. Type I assisted living facilities with two to five residents are Limited Capacity facilities classified as a Residential Group R-3 occupancy or are permitted to comply with the International Residential Code. See Section 202 for definitions."(28)(32)A new IBC, Section 310.4.5, is added as follows:"310.4.5 Child day care facilities ancillary to the main occupancy. Child day care facilities may be classified as accessory occupancies if the area complies with Section 508.2."(33)In IBC, Section 310.5, the words "Type II Limited Capacity and Type I Small, see Section 310.5.3" are added after the words "assisted living facilities."(29)(34)A new IBC, Section 310.5.3, is added as follows:  "310.5.3 Group R-4 Assisted living facility occupancy groups. The following occupancy groups shall apply to Assisted Living Facilities: Type II Assisted Living Facilities with two to five residents are Limited Capacity Facilities classified as a Residential Group R-4, Condition 2 occupancy. Type I assisted living facilities with six to sixteen16 residents are Small Facilities classified as Residential Group R-4, Condition 1 occupancies. See Section 202 for definitions."

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 15A-3-103 is amended to read:15A-3-103Effective 07/01/26. Amendments to Chapters 4 through 6 of IBC.(1)IBC Section 403.5.5 is deleted. (2)In IBC, Section 404.5, Exception 2.3 is added as follows:"2.3 The atrium does not contain any means of egress component above the two lowest stories."(3)In IBC, Section 407.2.5, the words "and assisted living facility" are added in the title and first sentence after the words "nursing home."(4)In IBC, Section 407.2.6, the words "and assisted living facility" are added in the title after the words "nursing home."(5)In IBC, Section 407.3.1.1, Item 3 is deleted and replaced with the following:"3. To provide makeup air for exhaust systems in accordance with Section 1020.6, Exception 1, doors to toilet rooms, bathrooms, shower rooms, sink closets, and similar auxiliary spaces that do not contain flammable or combustible materials are permitted to have louvers or an undercut of 2/3 inch (19.1 mm) maximum."(6)In IBC, Section 407.4.1, Exception 3 is added as follows:"3. Only one exit access with direct access to a corridor is required from an assisted living facility, single resident sleeping unit that consists of a living space and one or two separate sleeping rooms. For other than closets, toilet and shower rooms, occupants may not be required to pass through more than one room before reaching the exit access."(7)In IBC, Section 407.4.3, the words "and assisted living facility" are added in the title and after the words "nursing home."(8)In IBC, Section 407.11, a new exception is added as follows:  "Exception: An essential electrical system is not required in assisted living facilities."(9)In IBC, Section 412.3.1, a new exception is added as follows:  "Exception: Aircraft hangars of Type I or II construction that are less than 5,000 square feet (464.5m2) in area."(10)A new IBC, Section 422.2.1, is added as follows:   " "422.2.1 Separations: Ambulatory care facilities licensed by the Department of Health and Human Services shall be separated from adjacent tenants with a fire partition having a minimum one hour fire-resistance rating.  Any level below the level of exit discharge shall be separated from the level of exit discharge by a horizontal assembly having a minimum one hour fire-resistance rating.Exception: A fire barrier is not required to separate the level of exit discharge when:1.  Such levels are under the control of the Ambulatory Care Facility.2.  Any hazardous spaces are separated by horizontal assembly having a minimum one hour fire-resistance rating."(11)A new, IBC Section 429, Day Care, is added as follows:" 429.1 Detailed Requirements.  In addition to the occupancy and construction requirements in this code, the additional provisions of this section shall apply to all Day Care in accordance with Utah Administrative Code R710-8 Day Care RulesApplicability. The provisions of Sections 429.1 through 429.5 and other applicable provisions of this code shall apply to all occupancies containing day care facilities.429.2 Definitions.429.2.1 Authority Having Jurisdiction (AHJ): State Fire Marshal, his duly authorized deputies, or the local fire enforcement authority code officialAdult Day Care. Nonresidential care and supervision for three or more adults for at least four but less than 24 hours a day and that meets the needs of functionally impaired adults through a comprehensive program that provides a variety of health, social, recreational and related support services in a protective setting. For more information, refer to Utah Administrative Code, R501-13, Adult Day Care.429.2.2 Day Care Facility: Any building or structure occupied by clients of any age who receive custodial care for less than 24 hours by individuals other than parents, guardians, relatives by blood, marriage or adoptionCommercial Preschool Program. A facility where child care is provided for direct or indirect compensation on an ongoing basis in the absence of the child's parent for five or more unrelated children between the ages of two and five years old, for four or more hours, but not exceeding 24 hours a day, is not on a regular schedule, and is in a place other than the provider's or child's home. For more information, refer to Utah Administrative Code, R381-40, Commercial Preschool Programs.429.2.3 Day Care Center: Providing care for five or more clients in a place other than the home of the person cared for.  This would also include Child Care Centers, Out of School Time or Hourly Child Care Centers licensed by the Department of Health and Human ServicesHourly Child Care Center. A facility where child care is provided for direct or indirect compensation on an ongoing basis in the absence of the child's parent for five or more unrelated children, for four or more hours, but not exceeding 24 hours a day, is not on a regular schedule, and is in a place other than the provider's or child's home. For more information, please refer to Utah Administrative Code, R381-60, Hourly Child Care Centers.429.2.4 Family Day Care: Providing care for clients listed in the following two groups:Out-of-School-Time Child Care Program. A facility where child care is provided for direct or indirect compensation on an ongoing basis in the absence of the child's parent for five or more unrelated children who are at least five years old for less than 24 hours a day, in a place that is not the provider's or child's home. For more information refer to Utah Administrative Code, R381-70, Out-of-School-Time Child Care Programs.429.2.4.1 Type 1: Services provided for five to eight clients in a home.  This would also include a home that is certified by the Department of Health and Human Services as Residential Certificate Child Care or licensed as Family Child Care.429.2.4.2 Type 2: Services provided for nine to sixteen clients in a home with sufficient staffing.  This would also include a home that is licensed by the Department of Health and Human Services as Family Child Care.429.2.5 R710-8: Utah Administrative Code, R710-8, Day Care Rules, as enacted under the authority of the Utah Fire Prevention BoardChild Care Center. A facility where child care is provided in the absence of the child's parent on an ongoing basis for direct or indirect compensation for five or more unrelated children of any age for less than 24 hours a day in a place that is not the provider's or child's home. For more information refer to Utah Administrative Code, R381-100, Child Care Centers.429.2.6 Residential Certificate Child Care. A facility where child care is provided for direct or indirect compensation on an ongoing basis for four or more hours a day but less than 24 hours a day, for eight or fewer children or up to ten children including the provider's own children, of any age within a dwelling that is also the provider's home. For more information, refer to Utah Administrative Code, R381-50, Residential Certificate Child Care.429.2.7 Licensed Family Child Care. A facility where child care is provided for direct or indirect compensation on an ongoing basis, in the absence of a child's parent, for four or more hours a day but less than 24 hours a day, for nine or more unrelated children of any age, within a dwelling that is also the provider's home. For more information, please refer to Utah Administrative Code, R381-90, Licensed Family Child Care.429.3 Family Day CareDay Care Facilities.429.3.1 Family Day Care units shall have on each floor occupied by clients, two separate means of egress, arranged so that if one is blocked the other will be availableDetailed Requirements. In addition to the occupancy and construction requirements in this code, the additional provisions of this section shall apply to all day care in accordance with Utah Administrative Code, R710-8, Day Care Rules.429.3.2 Family Day Care units that are located in the basement or on the second story shall be provided with two means of egress, one of which shall discharge directly to the outsideEmergency Evacuation. A fire escape plan shall be completed and posted in a conspicuous place. All staff shall be trained on the fire escape plan and procedure. Emergency evacuation drills shall be completed in accordance with the International Fire Code and Utah Administrative Code, R710-8, Day Care Rules.429.3.2.1 Residential Certificate Child Care and Licensed Family Child Care with five to eight clients in a home, located on the ground level or in a basement, may use an emergency escape or rescue window as allowed in IFC, Chapter 10, Section 1030.429.3.3 Family Day Care units shall not be located above the second storyOccupancy Classification. Buildings or areas within a building containing a commercial preschool program, hourly child care center, out-of-school-time child care program or a child care center shall comply with the requirements of Group I-4, Group E, or the primary occupancy, whichever is applicable for the type of facility. Buildings or areas within a building containing a residential certificate child day care or a licensed family child day care shall be classified as Residential Group R-3 or shall comply with the International Residential Code.429.3.3.1 Child day care facilities having four or fewer children receiving care in a dwelling unit may be located in a Group R-2 occupancy.429.3.4 In Family Day Care units, clients under the age of two shall not be located above or below the first storyGroup E Occupancies.429.3.4.1 Clients under the age of two may be housed above or below the first story where there is at least one exit that leads directly to the outside and complies with IFC, Section 1011 or Section 1012 or Section 1027Stories containing a Group E child day care occupancy shall be located at the level of exit discharge.429.3.4.2 Child day care spaces for children over the age of two may be located one story above the level of exit discharge in buildings equipped with a 903.3.1.1 NFPA 13 sprinkler system throughout and the building is protected by an automatic fire detection system installed in accordance with Section 907.429.3.4.3. All Group E child day care spaces with an occupant load of more than 10 shall have a second means of egress. If the second means of egress is not an exit door leading directly to the exterior, the room shall have an emergency escape and rescue window complying with Chapter 10.429.3.5 Family Day Care units located in split entry/split level type homes in which stairs to the lower level and upper level are equal or nearly equal, may have clients housed on both levels when approved by the AHJ.429.3.6 Family Day Care units shall have a portable fire extinguisher on each level occupied by clients, which shall have a classification of not less than 2A:10BC, and shall be serviced in accordance with NFPA, Standard 10, Standard for Portable Fire Extinguishers.429.3.7 Family Day Care units shall have single station smoke detectors in good operating condition on each level occupied by clients.  Battery operated smoke detectors shall be permitted if the facility demonstrates testing, maintenance, and battery replacement to insure continued operation of the smoke detectors.429.3.8 Rooms in Family Day Care units that are provided for clients to sleep or nap, shall have at least one window or door approved for emergency escape.429.3.9 Fire drills shall be conducted in Family Day Care units quarterly and shall include the complete evacuation from the building of all clients and staff.  At least annually, in Type I Family Day Care units, the fire drill shall include the actual evacuation using the escape or rescue window, if one is used as a substitute for one of the required means of egress.429.4 Day Care CentersChild day care facilities located in a dwelling.429.4.1 Day Care Centers shall comply with either I-4 requirements or E requirements of the IBC, whichever is applicable for the type of Day Care CenterEach story of a dwelling used for child day care shall have two separate means of egress placed a distance apart equal to but not less than one-half of the length of the maximum overall diagonal dimension of the dwelling measured in a straight line between them.429.4.1.1 Where child day care is located one story above or below the level of exit discharge, one of the exits shall discharge directly to the outside.429.4.1.2 Child day care located on a level of exit discharge may use an emergency escape and rescue opening as one of the exits where approved by the authority having jurisdiction.429.4.2 Emergency Evacuation Drills shall be completed as required in IFC, Chapter 4, Section 405.429.4.3 Location at grade.  Group E child day care centers shall be located at the level of exit dischargeChild day care shall not be located on a story more than two stories above grade.429.4.3.1 Child day care spaces for children over the age of 24 months may be located on the second floor of buildings equipped with automatic fire protection throughout and an automatic fire alarm system.429.4.4 Egress.  All Group E child day care spaces with an occupant load of more than 10 shall have a second means of egress.  If the second means of egress is not an exit door leading directly to the exterior, the room shall have an emergency escape and rescue window complying with Section 1030Child day care for children under the age of two shall not be located on any level other than a level of exit discharge.429.4.4.1 Child day care for children under the age of two may be located above or below the first story where at least one exit leads directly to outside.429.4.5 All Group E Child Day Care Centers shall comply with Utah Administrative Code, R430-100 Child Care Centers, R430-60 Hourly Child Care Centers, and R430-70 Out of School TimeChild day care facilities located in a split entry or split level type dwelling in which stairs to both levels are equal or nearly equal may be located on both levels when approved by the authority having jurisdiction.429.4.6 Child day care facilities located in a dwelling shall have a portable fire extinguisher on each level with a classification of not less than 2A:10BC, and shall be serviced in accordance with NFPA 10, Standard for Portable Fire Extinguishers.429.4.7 Child day care facilities located in a dwelling shall have single station smoke detectors in good operating condition on each level.429.4.8 Rooms that are used for sleeping or napping shall have at least one emergency escape and rescue opening.429.4.9 Fire drills shall be conducted in family day care units quarterly and shall include the complete evacuation from the building of all clients and staff. At least annually, in Type I family day care units, the fire drill shall include the actual evacuation using the escape or rescue window, if one is used as a substitute for one of the required means of egress.429.5 Requirements for all Day Care.429.5.1 Heating equipment, fireplaces, and cooking equipment in spaces occupied by children shall be provided with partitions, screens, or other means to protect children from hot surfaces and open flames.429.5.2 A fire escape plan shall be completed and posted in a conspicuous place.  All staff shall be trained on the fire escape plan and procedure."(12)In IBC, Section 504.4, a new section is added as follows: "504.4.1 Group I-2 Assisted Living Facilities. Notwithstanding the allowable number of stories permitted by Table 504.4 Group I-2 Assisted Living Facilities of type VA, construction shall be allowed on each level of a two-story building when all of the following apply:1. The total combined area of both stories does not exceed the total allowable area for a one-story, above grade plane building equipped throughout with an automatic sprinkler system installed in accordance with Section 903.3.1.1.2. All other provisions that apply in Section 407 have been provided."(13)A new IBC, Section 504.5, is added as follows: "504.5 Group 1-2 Secured areas in Assisted Living Facilities. In Type IIIB, IV, and V construction, all areas for the use and care of residents required to be secured shall be located on the level of exit discharge with door operations in compliance with Section 1010.2.14."

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 15A-3-104 is amended to read:15A-3-104Effective 07/01/26. Amendments to Chapters 7 through 9 of IBC.(1)In IBC, Section 703.5, the words "with signs or stenciling" are deleted.(2)(1)IBC, Section (F) 902.1, is deleted and replaced with the following: "(F) 902.1 Pump and riser room size.  Fire pump rooms and automatic sprinkler system riser rooms shall be designed with adequate space for all installed equipment necessary for the installation and to provide sufficient working room around the stationary equipment.  Clearances around equipment to elements of permanent construction, including other installed equipment and appliances, shall be sufficient to allow inspection, service, repair or replacement without removing such elements of permanent construction or disabling the function of a required fire-resistance-rated assembly and not less than the following minimum elements:902.1.1 A minimum clear and unobstructed distance of 12-inches shall be provided from the installed equipment to the elements of permanent construction.902.1.2 A minimum clear and unobstructed distance of 12-inches shall be provided between all other installed equipment and appliances.902.1.3 A clear and unobstructed width of 36-inches shall be provided in front of all installed equipment and appliances, to allow for inspection, service, repair or replacement without removing such elements of permanent construction or disabling the function of a required fire-resistance-rated assembly."(3)(2)In IBC, Section 902, new sections are added as follows:"(F) 902.2 Fire pump room. Fire pumps and controllers shall be provided with ready access. Fire pump rooms shall be provided with doors and an unobstructed passageway large enough to allow for the removal of the largest piece of equipment. The passageway shall have a clear width not less than 72 inches. Openings into the room shall be clear and unobstructed, with doors swinging in the outward direction from the fire pump room and the opening providing a clear width of not less than 68 inches and a clear height of the door opening shall not be less than 80 inches. The door shall be permitted to be locked provided that the key is available at all times and located in a Key Box in accordance with Section 506 of the International Fire Code. (F) 902.3 Automatic sprinkler riser room. Automatic sprinkler system risers shall be provided with ready access. Automatic sprinkler system riser rooms shall be provided with doors and an unobstructed passageway large enough to allow for the removal of the largest piece of equipment. The passageway shall have a clear width not less than 36 inches. Openings into the room shall be clear and unobstructed, with doors swinging in the outward direction from the riser room and the opening providing a clear width of not less than 32 inches and a clear height of the door opening shall not be less than 80 inches. The door shall be permitted to be locked provided that the key is available at all times and located in a Key Box in accordance with Section 506 of the International Fire Code. (F) 902.4 Marking on access doors. Access doors for automatic sprinkler system riser rooms and fire pump rooms shall be labeled with an approved sign. The lettering shall be in contrasting color to the background. Letters shall have a minimum height of 2two inches (51 mm) with a minimum stroke of 3/8 inch (10 mm). (F) 902.5 Environment. Automatic sprinkler system riser rooms and fire pump rooms shall be maintained at a temperature of not less than 40 degrees Fahrenheit (4 degrees Celsius). Heating units shall be permanently installed. (F) 902.6 Lighting. Permanently installed artificial illumination shall be provided in the automatic sprinkler system riser rooms and fire pump rooms."(4)(3)IBC, Section (F)903.2.2, is deleted and replaced with the following:"(F) 903.2.2 Ambulatory care facilities. An automatic sprinkler system shall be installed throughout the building containing an ambulatory care facility where either of the following conditions exist at any time.1. Four or more care recipients are incapable of self-preservation.2. One or more care recipients that are incapable of self-preservation are located at other than the level of exit discharge serving such a facility."(5)(4)IBC, Section (F)903.2.4, condition 2, is deleted and replaced with the following:  "2.  A Group F-1 fire area is located more than three stories above the lowest level of fire department vehicle access."(6)(5)IBC, Section (F)903.2.7, condition 2, is deleted and replaced with the following:  "2.  A Group M fire area is located more than three stories above the lowest level of fire department vehicle access."(7)(6)In IBC, Section (F)903.2.8, the following exceptions are added:"Exceptions:1.  Detached one- and two-family dwellings and multiple single-family dwellings (townhouses) constructed in accordance with the International Residential Code For One- and Two-Family Dwellings.2.  Single story Group R-1 occupancies with fire areas not more than 2,000 square feet that contain no installed plumbing or heating, where no cooking occurs, and constructed of Type I-A, I-B, II-A, or II-B construction.3. Group R-4 fire areas not more than 4,500 gross square feet and not containing more than 16 residents, provided all residents are housed on a level of exit discharge and the building is equipped throughout with an approved fire alarm system that is interconnected and receives its primary power from the building wiring and a commercial power system."(8)(7)IBC, Section (F) 903.2.8.1, is deleted.(9)(8)IBC, Section (F)903.2.9, condition 2, is deleted and replaced with the following:  "2.  A Group S-1 fire area is located more than three stories above the lowest level of fire department vehicle access."(10)(9)In IBC, Section 905, a new subsection, Section (F)905.3.9, is added as follows:"Open Parking Garages.  Open parking garages shall be equipped with an approved Class 1 manual standpipe system when fire department access is not provided for firefighting operations to within 150 feet of all portions of the open parking garage as measured from the approved fire department vehicle access.  Class 1 manual standpipe shall be accessible throughout the parking garage such that all portions of the parking structure are protected within 150 feet of a hose connection."(11)(10)In IBC, Section (F)905.8, the exception is deleted and replaced with the following:"Exception: Where subject to freezing and approved by the fire code official."(12)(11)In IBC, Section (F)907.2.3, Group E is deleted and rewritten as followsreplaced with the following: "A manual fire alarm system that initiates the occupant notification signal using an emergency voice/alarm communication system that meets the requirements of Section (F) 907.5.2.2, or a manual fire alarm system that initiates an approved audible and visual occupant notification signal that meets the requirements of Sections (F)907.5.2.1, (F)907.5.2.1.1, (F)907.5.2.1.2, and (F)907.5.2.3, and is installed in accordance with Section (F)907.6 shall be installed in Group E occupancies. Where automatic fire sprinkler systems or smoke detectors are installed, the fire sprinkler systems and smoke detectors shall be connected to the building fire alarm system."(13)(12)In IBC, Section (F) 907.2.3 Group E, Exception 2 is deleted and the remaining exceptions are renumbered.(14)(13)In IBC, Section (F) 907.2.3 Group E, renumbered Exception 3.2 is deleted and replaced with the following:  "Exception 3.2 The fire alarm system will activate on fire sprinkler waterflow."(15)(14)In IBC, Section (F) 907.2.3 Group E, new sectionsSections (F) 907.2.3.1 through (F) 907.2.3.7 are added as follows:"(F) 907.2.3.1 Automatic detection devices that detect smoke shall be installed throughout all corridors and spaces open to the corridor at the maximum prescribed spacing of thirty feet on center and no more than fifteen feet from the walls or smoke detectors shall be installed as required in NFPA, Standard 72, Section 17.7. (F) 907.2.3.2 Where structures are not protected or are partially protected with an automatic fire sprinkler system, approved automatic smoke detectors shall be installed in accordance with the complete coverage requirements of NFPA, Standard 72. (F) 907.2.3.3 An approved key plan drawing and operating instructions shall be posted at the main fire alarm panel which displays the location of all alarm zones and if applicable, device addresses. (F) 907.2.3.4 The main panel shall be located in a normally attended area such as the main office or lobby. Location of the main panel other than as stated above, shall require the review and authorization of the State Fire Marshal Division. Where location as required above is not possible, an electronically supervised remote annunciator from the main panel shall be located in a supervised area of the building. The remote annunciator shall visually indicate system power status, alarms for each zone, and give both visual and audible indication of trouble conditions in the system. All indicators on both the main panel and remote annunciator shall be adequately labeled. (F) 907.2.3.5 All system wiring shall be as follows:   (A) The initiating device circuits shall be designated and installed Class A as defined in NFPA, Standard 72.  (B) The notification appliance circuits shall be designated and installed Class A as defined in NFPA, Standard 72.  (C) Signaling line circuits shall be designated and installed Class A loop as defined in NFPA, Standard 72. (F) 907.2.3.6 Fan Shutdown shall be as follows:  (A) Fan shut down shall be as required in the International Mechanical Code, Chapter 6, Section 606.  (B) Duct detectors required by the International Mechanical Code, shall be interconnected and compatible with the fire alarm system."(16)(15)IBC, Section (F) 915.2.3 Group E occupancies is deleted and replaced with the following:"(F) 915.2.3 Group E occupancies. Carbon monoxide detectors shall be installed in the following areas within Group E occupancies:  (1) Boiler rooms, furnace rooms, and similar rooms, or in adjacent areas where carbon monoxide is likely to spread. (The installation of carbon monoxide detectors in boiler rooms and furnace rooms may cause a false alarm problem. Installing these detectors in adjacent spaces where the carbon monoxide is likely to spread from these spaces may be a better option.)  (2) Home economics rooms with gas appliances.  (3) School kitchens with gas appliances. (Commercial kitchens).  (4) Arts rooms and other areas with a gas kiln or open flame.  (5) Gas roof top units, and other carbon monoxide producing HVAC units, one per zone. (The zone shall be the area covered by the HVAC unit.)  (6) In areas with gas wall units.  (7) In areas with a gas water heater or boiler.  (8) Areas with a forge or foundry.  (9) Metal shop or auto shop areas or in adjacent areas where carbon monoxide is likely to spread. (The installation of carbon monoxide detectors in metal shop or auto shop areas may cause a false alarm problem. Installing these detectors in adjacent spaces, i.e. class rooms or corridors, where the carbon monoxide is likely to spread from these spaces may be a better option.)  (10) Labs with open flame.  (11) HVAC units drawing outside air that could be contaminated with carbon monoxide.  (12) Other areas with an open flame or fuel fired appliance. (F) 915.2.3.1 Carbon monoxide alarm signals shall be automatically transmitted to an onsite location that is staffed by school personnel.Exception: Carbon monoxide alarm signals shall not be required to be automatically transmitted to an onsite location that is staffed by school personnel in Group E occupancies with an occupant load of 30 or less."(17)(16)A new IBC, Section (F) 915.7 is added as follows:"(F) 915.7 Carbon monoxide systems in Group E occupancies. Carbon monoxide systems may be part of a fire alarm system or standalone system. (F) 915.7.1 Power and wiring. (F) 915.7.1.1 Power. Carbon monoxide detection systems shall require a primary and secondary power source. (F) 915.7.1.2 Wiring. Class "A" wiring is required when the carbon monoxide system is part of, or connected to, a fire alarm system. Standalone carbon monoxide detection systems may use Class "B" wiring. All wiring shall be Class "A" or "B." (F) 915.7.2 Equipment shut down. Equipment and appliances that are producing carbon monoxide shall shut down automatically in the zone involved upon carbon monoxide system activation. (F) 915.7.3 Notification. (F) 915.7.3.1 Local alarm. Each occupied space shall sound an audible alarm when detecting carbon monoxide at a level in excess of 70 ppm for one hour. (F) 915.7.3.2 General alarm. A blue strobe, visual alarm, is required in a normally occupied location, similar to the administrative offices, when carbon monoxide is detected in the facility in excess of 70 ppm for one hour. (F) 915.7.3.2.1 The general alarm shall require a manual reset following an alarm activation. (F) 915.7.3.3 Digital notification. Portable carbon monoxide detectors, with digital read out indicating parts per million of carbon monoxide, in a space to determine the level of hazard in a given space. (F) 915.7.4 Monitoring. System monitoring is not required. If the system is monitored, the signal should be a supervisory signal indicating carbon monoxide. (F) 915.7.5 Inspection. (F) 915.7.5.1 The carbon monoxide detection system shall be tested in the presence of a Deputy or Special Deputy of the State Fire Marshal Division. The Deputy shall require "spot testing" of the system and its components. (F) 915.7.5.2 Before requesting final inspection and approval, the installing contractor shall test each component of the system and issue a statement of compliance, in writing, to the State Fire Marshal Division that the carbon monoxide detection system has been installed in accordance with approved plans and has been tested in accordance with the manufacturer's specifications, and the appropriate installation standard. (F) 915.7.5.3 Systems shall be tagged with the State approved tag for fire alarm systems, upon final approval and shall be inspected and tagged annually by an individual certified as a Master Fire Alarm Technician, by the State Fire Marshal Division. (F) 915.7.6 Evacuation. The affected area within Group E occupancies shall be evacuated when carbon monoxide is detected at a level in excess of 70 ppm for one hour in that area."

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 15A-3-105 is amended to read:15A-3-105Effective 07/01/26. Amendments to Chapters 10 through 12 of IBC.(1)In IBC, Section 1010.2.4, number (2), the following is added at the end of the sentence: "Blended assisted living facilities shall comply with Section 1010.2.14.11010.2.13.1."(2)A new IBC, Section 1010.2.14.11010.2.13.1, is added as follows:  "1010.2.14.1 "1010.2.13.1 Blended assisted living facilities. In occupancy Group I-1, Condition 2 or Group I-2, a Type-II assisted living facility licensed by the Department of Health and Human Services for residents with Alzheimer's or dementia, and having a controlled egress locking system to prevent operation from the egress side shall be permitted to also house residents without a clinical need for their containment where all of the following provisions are met:(a)locks in the means of egress comply with all IBC requirements for controlled egress doors;(b)all residents without a clinical need for their containment shall have the keys, codes, or other means necessary to exit the facility, in a manner that is determined by the facility operator and communicated to the resident or their legal representative;(c)residents or their legal representative acknowledge in writing that they understand and agree to living in a facility where egress is controlled; and(d)the number of residents housed in a smoke compartment with controlled egress shall not be greater than 30."(3)In IBC, Section 1011.5.2, exceptionException 3 is deleted and replaced with the following:  " "3.  In Group R-3 occupancies, within dwelling units in Group R-2 occupancies, and in Group U occupancies that are accessory to a Group R-3 occupancy, or accessory to individual dwelling units in Group R-2 occupancies, the maximum riser height shall be 8eight inches (203 mm) and the minimum tread depth shall be 9nine inches (229 mm).  The minimum winder tread depth at the walk line shall be 10 inches (254 mm), and the minimum winder tread depth shall be 6six inches (152 mm).  A nosing not less than 0.75 inch (19.1 mm) but not more than 1.25 inches (32 mm) shall be provided on stairways with solid risers where the tread depth is less than 10 inches (254 mm)."(4)In IBC, Section 1011.11, a new exceptionException 6 is added as follows:  " "6.  In occupancies in Group R-3, as applicable in Section 101.2 and in occupancies in Group U, which are accessory to an occupancy in Group R-3, as applicable in Section 101.2, handrails shall be provided on at least one side of stairways consisting of four or more risers."(5)In IBC, Section 1025, is deleted.(6)In IBC, Section 1104.4, exceptionException 1.5 is deleted.(7)In IBC, Section 1110.4.1(4), the following is added at the end of the sentence:"as defined in Section 72-7-502 of the Utah Code."

Section 6:
Section 6. Section 15A-3-106 is amended to read:15A-3-106Effective 07/01/26. Amendments to Chapters 13 through 15 of IBC.(1)IBC, Chapters 13, 14, and 15 and 14 are not amended.(2)In IBC, Section 1512.2, a new Exception 2 is added as follows:"(2) Where permitted by the roof covering manufacturer, any existing layers of polyisocyanurate insulation, expanded polystyrene (EPS), or extruded polystyrene (XPS), shall be permitted to remain in place if the  roof deck is evaluated, is in serviceable condition, and the insulation is not damaged, deteriorated or water soaked. All other types of roof insulation and any areas of damage, deteriorated or water soaked insulation shall be removed and replaced with new insulation."

Section 7:
Section 7. Section 15A-3-107 is amended to read:15A-3-107Effective upon governor's approval. Amendments to Chapter 16 of IBC.(1)In IBC, Table 1604.5, Risk Category III, in the sentence that begins "Group I-2 Condition 1," a new footnote c is added as follows: "c.  Type II Assisted Living Facilities that are I-2 Condition 1 occupancy classifications in accordance with Section 308 shall be Risk Category II in this table."(2)(1)In IBC, Section 1605.1, Exception 2 is deleted and replaced with the following:"2.  Where the allowable stress design load combinations of ASCE 7 Section 2.4 are used, flat roof snow loads of 3045 pounds per square foot (1.44kN/m2) (2.15kN/m2) or less and roof live loads of 3045 pounds per square foot (1.44kN/m2)  (2.15kN/m2) or less need not be combined with seismic loads. Where flat roof snow loads exceed 3045 pounds per square foot (1.44kN/m2)(2.15kN/m2), the snow loads may be reducedshall be in accordance with the following in load combinations including both snow and seismic loads. S as calculated below, shall be combined with seismic loads.S = (0.20 + 0.025 (A-5))(0.15 + 0.016 (A-5))Proof, where S shall be greater than or equal to 0.20Proof0.15 Proof.Where:S = Weight of snow to be used in combination with seismic loads.A = Elevation above sea level at the location of the structure (ft/1,000)Proof = Design roof snow loads, Pf or Ps, psfFor the purpose of this section, snow load shall be assumed uniform on the horizontal projection without including the effects of drift or sliding. The Importance Factor, I,  Risk Category factor used in calculating Pf may be considered 1.0Risk Category II."(3)(2)In IBC, Section 1605.1 a new exception 4Exception 5 is added as follows:"4.  "5. ASCE 7-167-22 Section 2.3.6 Equation 6 shall be modified to 1.2D + Ev + Eh + L +f2S and 1.2D + Ev + Emh + L +f2S with f2 = (0.20 +0.025(A-5))  (0.15 + 0.016 (A-5)) where the roof snow load exceeds 3045 pounds per square foot (1.44kN/m2)(2.15kN/m2). Where A = Elevation above sea level at the location of the structure (ft/1000). f2 = 0 for roof snow loads of 3045 pounds per square foot (1.44kN/m2) (2.15kN/m2) or less."(4)IBC, Section 1608.1, is deleted and replaced with the following: "1608.1 General. Except as modified in Sections 1608.1.1 and 1608.1.2, design snow loads shall be determined in accordance with Chapter 7 of ASCE 7, but the design roof load shall not be less than that determined by Section 1607. Where the minimum live load, in accordance with Section 1607, is greater than the design roof snow load, the live load shall be used for design, but it may not be reduced to a load lower than the design roof snow load. Drifting need not be considered for design roof snow loads, less than 20 psf."(5)A new IBC, Section 1608.1.1, is added as follows: "1608.1.1 Ice dams and icicles along eaves. Section 7.4.5 of Chapter 7 of ASCE 7 referenced in IBC Section 1608.1 is deleted and replaced with the following: 7.4.5 Ice Dams and Icicles Along Eaves.  Where ground snow loads exceed 75 psf, eaves shall be capable of sustaining a uniformly distributed load of 2pf on all overhanging portions.  No other loads except dead loads shall be present on the roof when this uniformly distributed load is applied.  All building exits under down-slope eaves shall be protected from sliding snow and ice."(6)(3)A new IBC, Section 1608.1.2A new IBC, Section 1608.1.1, is added as follows:   "1608.1.2 "1608.1.1. Drifts on adjacent structures. Section 7.7.2 of ASCE 7 referenced in IBC, Section 1608.1, is deleted and replaced with the following:  7.7.2 Adjacent structures. At lower adjacent structures, the requirements of Section 7.7.1 shall be used to calculate windward and leeward drifts. The resulting drift is permitted to be truncated."(7)A new IBC, Section 1608.2.1 is added as follows: "1608.2.1 Utah ground snow loads. Section 7.2 of ASCE 7 referenced in IBC, Section 1608.1 is modified as follows:(a)In paragraph 1, 7.2-8 is deleted and replaced with 7.2-9.(b)On Figure 7.2-1, remove CS and other ground snow load values in the state of Utah. Add red shaded region for the state of Utah with the following note: See note for Utah.(c)The following is added to the Note on Figure 7.2.1: See Table 7.2-9 for Utah.(d)Add Table 7.2-9 as follows:     TABLE 7.2-9GROUND SNOW LOADS FOR SELECTED LOCATIONS IN UTAHCity/TownCountyGround Snow Load (lb/ft2)Elevation (ft)BeaverBeaver355886Brigham CityBox Elder424423Castle DaleEmery325669CoalvilleSummit575581DuchesneDuchesne395508FarmingtonDavis354318FillmoreMillard305138Heber CityWasatch605604JunctionPiute276030KanabKane254964LoaWayne377060LoganCache434531ManilaDaggett266368MantiSanpete375620MoabGrand214029MonticelloSan Juan677064MorganMorgan525062NephiJuab395131OgdenWeber374334PanguitchGarfield416630ParowanIron326007PriceCarbon315558ProvoUtah314541RandolphRich506286RichfieldSevier275338St. GeorgeWashington212585Salt Lake CitySalt Lake284239TooeleTooele355029VernalUintah395384Note: To convert lb/ft2 to kN/m2, multiply by 0.0479. To convert feet to meters, multiply by 0.3048.1. Statutory requirements of the Authority Having Jurisdiction are not included in this state ground snow load table.2. For locations where there is substantial change in altitude over the city/town, the load applies at and below the cited elevation, with a tolerance of 100 ft (30 m).3. For other locations in Utah, see Bean, B., Maguire, M., Sun, Y. (2018), "The Utah Snow Load Study," Utah State University Civil and Environmental Engineering Faculty Publications, Paper 3589, http://utahsnowload.usu.edu/, for ground snow load values."(8)(4)A new IBC, Section 1613.1.1, is added as follows:  "1613.1.1 Effective Seismic Weight. In ASCE 7 12.7.2 and 12.14.8.1 as referenced in Section 1613.1, Definition of W, Item 4 is deleted and replaced with the following:4.  Where flat roof snow load, Pf, exceeds 30 psf (1.44kN/m2)45 pounds per square foot (2.15kN/m2), the snow load included in the effective seismic weight shall be calculated, in accordance with the following equation: Ws = (0.20 + 0.025(A-5))Pf >= 0.20 PfWs=(0.15 + 0.016(A-5))Pf >=0.15 Pf.WHEREWhere:Ws = Weight of snow to be included as effective seismic weightA = Elevation above sea level at the location of the structure (ft./1,000)Pf = Design flat roof snow load, psf.For the purposes of this section, snow load shall be assumed uniform on the horizontal projection without including the effects of drift or sliding.  The Importance Factor, Is,Risk Category factor used in calculating Pf may be considered 1.0Risk Category II for use in the formula for Ws."(5)A new IBC, Section 1613.1.2, is added as follows:"1613.1.2 Equivalent Lateral Forces (ELF) Procedure. In ASCE 7 Section 12.8.1.1 the first paragraph is deleted and replaced with the following: Where the design special acceleration parameter Sa determined in accordance with either Section 11.4.5.1 or Chapter 21 is available, Method 1 shall be used to determine the seismic response coefficient, Cs. Where Exception 2 of Section 11.4.5 applies, Method 1 shall not be used. The lower bound for the seismic response coefficient, Cs, provided in Eq.12.8-6 or 12.8-7 shall be applicable for both Method 1 and Method 2."

Section 8:
Section 8. Section 15A-3-108 is amended to read:15A-3-108Effective upon governor's approval. Amendments to Chapters 17 through 19 of IBC.(1)A new IBC, Section 1807.1.6.4, is added as follows:   "1807.1.6.4 Empirical concrete foundation design.  Group R, Division 3 Occupancies three stories or less in height, and Group U Occupancies, which are constructed in accordance with Section 2308, or with other methods employing repetitive wood-frame construction or repetitive cold-formed steel structural member construction, shall be permitted to have concrete foundations constructed in accordance with Table 1807.1.6.4."(2)A new IBC, Table 1807.1.6.4 is added as follows:         "TABLE 1807.1.6.4EMPIRICAL FOUNDATION WALLS (1,7,8)Max. HeightTop Edge SupportMin.Thickn essVertic al Steel (2)Horizon tal Steel (3)Steel atOpenings (4)Max. Lintel LengthMin. Lintel Length2'(610 mm)None6"(5)2- #4 Bars2- #4 Bars above1- #4 Bar each side1- #4 Bar below2'(610 mm)2" for each foot of opening width;min. 6"3'(914 mm)None6"#4@3 2"3- #4 Bars2- #4 Bars above1- #4 Bar each side1- #4 Bar below2'(610 mm)2" for each foot of opening width;min. 6"4'(1,219 mm)None6"#4@3 2"4- #4 Bars2- #4 Bars above1- #4 Bar each side1- #4 Bar below3'(914 mm)2" for each foot of opening width;min. 6"6'(1,829 mm)Floor or roof Diaphra gm (6)8"#4@2 4"5- #4 Bars2- #4 Bars above1- #4 Bar each side1- #4 Bar below6'(1,829 mm)2" for each foot of opening width;min. 6"8'(2,438 mm)Floor or roof Diaphra gm (6)8"#4@2 4"6- #4 Bars2- #4 Bars above1- #4 Bar each side1- #4 Bar below6'(1,829 mm)2" for each foot of opening width;min. 6"9'(2,743 mm)Floor or roof Diaphra gm (6)8"#4@1 6"7- #4 Bars2- #4 Bars above1- #4 Bar each side1- #4 Bar below6'(1,829 mm)2" for each foot of opening width;min. 6"Over 9'(2,743 mm), Engineering required for each columnFootnotes:(1)  Based on 3,000 psi (20.6 Mpa) concrete and 60,000 psi (414 Mpa) reinforcing steel.(2)  To be placed in the center of the wall, and extended from the footing to within three inches (76 mm) of the top of the wall; dowels of #4 bars to match vertical steel placement shall be provided in the footing, extending 24 inches (610 mm) into the foundation wall.(3)  One bar shall be located in the top four inches (102 mm), one bar in the bottom four inches (102 mm) and the other bars equally spaced between.  Such bar placement satisfies the requirements of Section 1808.8.6.  Corner reinforcing shall be provided so as to lap 24 inches (610 mm).(4)  Bars shall be placed within two inches (51 mm) of the openings and extend 24 inches (610 mm) beyond the edge of the opening; vertical bars may terminate three inches (76 mm) from the top of the concrete.(5)  Dowels of #4 bar at 32 inches on center shall be provided in the footing, extending 18 inches (457 mm) into the foundation wall.(6)  Diaphragm shall conform to the requirements of Section 2308.(7)  Footing shall be a minimum of nine inches thick by 20 inches wide.(8)  Soil backfill shall be soil classification types GW, GP, SW, or SP, per Table 1610.1.  Soil shall not be submerged or saturated in groundwater."(3)A new IBC, Section 1905.1.9Section 1904.3, is added as follows:  "1905.1.9 "1904.3 ACI 318, Section 19.3.1.1."  Modify ACI 318, Table 19.3.1.1 to read as follows: In the portion of the table designated as "Conditions", the following Exposure category and class is deleted and replaced with the following:"F0: Concrete elements not exposed to freezing and thawing cycles including footing elements, such as footings, tie beams, piles, and pile caps, etc., that are completely buried in soil."(4)A new IBC, Section 1905.8, is added as follows:"1905.8 In ACI 318, Section 18.10.3 is deleted and replaced with the following:18.10.3 Design Forces:18.10.3.1 Design shear forces for horizontal wall segments, including coupling beams, shall be in accordance with 18.10.7.18.10.3.2 Design shear forces for wall piers shall be in accordance with 18.10.8.18.10.3.3 Design shear forces for parts of walls not covered by 18.10.3.1 or 18.10.3.2 shall be in accordance with the requirements of 18.10.3.3.1 through 18.10.3.3.5.18.10.3.3.1 If the wall design actions are determined in accordance with nonlinear dynamic analysis procedures satisfying Appendix A, design forces shall be as determined in Appendix A.18.10.3.3.2 If the design shear force is determined by linear analysis procedures of the general building code, it shall be amplified by the product v v, where v and v, are defined in 18.10.3.3.3 through 18.10.3.3.5.18.10.3.3.3 v and v, shall be in accordance with Table 18.10.3.3.3. Alternatively, it shall be permitted to calculate v = Mpr/Mu at the critical section for flexure, where Mpr is calculated for axial force that includes the effects of and the expected gravity loads, with expected gravity loads in accordance with ASCE/SEI 7 Section 16.3.2.Table 18.10.3.3.3 Factors v and v    Conditionvvhwcs/lw1.01.01.01.0 < hwcs/lw < 2.0Linear interpolation permitted between 1.0 and 1.51.0hwcs/lw  2.01.50.8 + 0.09hn1/3  1.018.10.3.3.4 If the general building code includes provision to account for over strength of the seismic-force-resisting system, it shall be permitted to take v v equal to o.18.10.3.3.5 If 3 v v = o, it shall be permitted to take the redundancy factor contained in the general building code equal to 1.0 for determination of the design shear force."(5)A new IBC, Section 1905.9, is added as follows:"1905.9 In ACI 318, Section 21.2.4.1, the following words are added after the words "resist E", except for walls where v 1.5 or if v is taken as equal to o."(6)A new IBC, Section 1909, Modifications to ACI 318, is added as follows:"1909.1 General. The text of ACI 318 shall be modified as indicated in Sections 1909.2 through 1909.5.1909.2 ACI 318 Section 13.2.6.2, For shallow foundation members continuously supported by soil and designed based upon the assumption of rigid behavior of the shallow member, (a) and (b) shall be permitted:(a) For one-way shear strength, Vc shall be taken as: Vc = 2flcbwd.(b) For two-way shear strength, the size factor, s, specified in 22.6 shall be taken equal to 1.0.1909.3 ACI 318, Section 13.3.6.1.1 is added as follows:13.3.6.1.1 It shall be permitted to calculate Vc for cantilever retaining wall as Vc =2flcbwd.1909.4 ACI 318, Section 13.3.7 Basement Walls is added as follows:13.3.7.1 The design of basement walls to resist out-of-plane lateral earth pressures shall satisfy (a) through (e):(a) Basement walls shall be designed as one-way slabs in accordance with the applicable provision of Chapter 7 or as two-way slabs in accordance with the applicable provision of Chapter 8.(b) Basement walls shall be designed to resist hydrostatic pressure, if applicable.(c) It shall be permitted to calculate the one-way sheer strength of concrete as Vc = 2flcbwd.(d) For two-way shear strength, the size effect factor s, as specified in 22.6 shall be taken equal to 1.0.(e) Basement walls shall satisfy the applicable provision of Chapter 18.13.3.7.2. For loads other than out-of-plane lateral earth pressure, basement walls shall satisfy the applicable provisions of Chapter 11." (7)1909.5 ACI 318, Section 22.5.5.1.1, is deleted and replaced with the following:"22.5.5.1.1 Vc shall not be taken as greater than 5flcbwd. Vc need not be taken less than flcbwd except in cases (a) or (b):(a) elements subject to net axial tension(b) if Sections 18.6.5.2 or 18.7.6.2.1 apply."

Section 9:
Section 9. Section 15A-3-110 is amended to read:15A-3-110Effective 07/01/26. Amendments to Chapters 23 through 25 of IBC.(1)A new IBC, Section 2306.1.5IBC, Section 2306.1.6, is added as follows:  "2306.1.5 "2306.1.6 Load duration factors.  The allowable stress increase of 1.15 for snow load, shown in Table 2.3.2, Frequently Used Load Duration Factors, Cd, of the National Design Specifications, shall not be utilized at elevations above 5,000 feet (1,524 M)."(2)In IBC, Section 2308.3.1In IBC, Section 2308.7.1, the words "6 feet (1829 mm)" and "4 feet (1219 mm)" are deleted and each replaced with the words "32 inches."(3)A new IBC, Section 2406.6, is added as follows:"2406.6 Glazing in Educational Occupancies (K-12). Exterior entrance level windows within 25 feet of an exterior entrance shall have ballistic glass or security glazing, extending from ground level to a minimum height of six feet from ground level.Windows surrounding the interior of the classroom entrance or instructional areas shall have ballistic glass or security glazing installed, extending from the floor to a minimum height of six feet from the floor.2406.6.1 Standard for Security Glazing in Educational Occupancies (K-12). For the purpose of this section, Ballistic glass is defined as glass certified at a minimum level of:(i) Underwriters Laboratories Standard UL752-23, Standard for Bullet-Resisting Equipment,Threat Level UL-RF-E from Table C1 (Legacy Level) (2023); or(ii) ASTM F3279-24, Standard Test Methods for Ballistic Resistant Security Glazing Materials,Threat and Performance Level 4, Ballistic Test Identity (BTI) R1-T1-C5-2L under Table 1,Ballistic Criteria (2021).Security glazing is defined as a clear or tinted durable material applied to glass doors and windows that enhances the structural integrity of the glass by preventing it from shattering and falling to the ground when impacted by an object and meets the minimum standard established by:(i) ASTM F3561, Standard Test Method for Forced-Entry-Resistance of Fenestration Systems After Simulated Active Shooter Attack, minimum level 3 of Table 2, Potential Energy of Impactor and Drop Height (2023); or(ii) ANSI Z97.1-15 (R20) American National Standards For Safety Glazing Materials used in Buildings safety performance specifications and methods of test, shall meet the durability requirements of Sections 5.3 and 5.4.References:Minimum Safety and Security Standards for School FacilitiesState Security Chief: Subsections 53-22-102(3)(b) and (c)County Security Chief: Subsection 53-22-103(2)State Board of Education Construction Guidelines: Sections 53E-3-702; 53E-3-706Panic device: Section 56G-8-805"

Section 10:
Section 10. Section 15A-3-202 is amended to read:15A-3-202Effective 07/01/26. Amendments to Chapters 1 through 5 of IRC.(1)In IRC, Section R101.2, after the sentence ending with "not more than three stories above grade plane in height." the following words are added:"This code shall not require modifications to a building component that is not being altered as part of an alteration, movement, replacement or repair of an existing structure."(2)In IRC, Section R101.2, Exception, the wordsthe following words are deleted: "where provided with an automatic sprinkler system complying with Section P2904." are deleted.(2)(3)In IRC, Section R101.2, Exception, the wordsthe following words are added: "6. A triplex or fourplex of no more than two levels with 2-hour fire-resistance-rated vertical shared wall assemblies tested in accordance with ASTM E119 or UL263, 1-hour fire-resistance-rated horizontal floor assemblies tested in accordance with ASTM E119 or UL263, and independent egress for each unit." are added.(3)(4)In IRC, Section R102, a new Section R102.7.2 is added as follows:  "R102.7.2 Physical change for bedroom window egress.  A structure whose egress window in an existing bedroom is smaller than required by this code, and that complied with the construction code in effect at the time that the bedroom was finished, is not required to undergo a physical change to conform to this code if the change would compromise the structural integrity of the structure or could not be completed in accordance with other applicable requirements of this code, including setback and window well requirements."(4)(5)In IRC Section R105.2, under Building, the following changes are made:(a)Number 3 is deleted and replaced with the following:  "3. Retaining walls retaining less than 4four feet (1219mm) of unbalanced fill, unless supporting a surcharge or requiring design per Section R404.4."(b)Number 10 is deleted and replaced with the following:  "10. Decks that are not more than 30 inches (762mm) above grade at any point and not requiring guardrails, that do not serve exit door required by Section R311.4."(5)(6)In IRC, Section R105.2, a new exception is added:  "11. Grade level, non-connected conex boxes, less than 350 square feet, used for storage only."(6)(7)In IRC, Section R108.3, the following sentence is added at the end of the section:  "The building official shall not request proprietary information."(7)(8)In IRC, Section 109.1.5, is deleted and replaced with the following:  "R109.1.5 Other inspections. In addition to the inspections listed in R109.1.1 through R109.1.4, the building official shall have the authority to inspect the proper installation of insulation. R109.1.5.1 Weather-resistant exterior wall envelope inspections. An inspection shall be made of the weather-resistant exterior wall envelope as required by Section R703.1 and flashings as required by Section R703.4 to prevent water from entering the weather-resistive barrier.R109.1.5.2 Fire-resistance-rated construction inspection. Where fire-resistance-rated construction is required between dwelling units or due to location on property, the building official shall require an inspection of such construction after lathing or gypsum board or gypsum panel products are in place, but before any plaster is applied, or before board or panel joints and fasteners are taped and finished."(8)(9)In IRC, Section R202, the following definition is added:  "ACCESSORY DWELLING UNIT: A habitable living unit created within the existing footprint of a primary owner-occupied single-family dwelling."(9)(10)In IRC, Section R202, the definition for "Approved"APPROVED" is modified by adding the words "or independent third-party licensed engineer or architect and submitted to the building official" after the word "official."(10)(11)In IRC, Section R202, the definition for "Approved Agency"APPROVAL AGENCY" is modified by replacing the word "and" with "or."(11)(12)In IRC, Section 202, the definition for "Approved SourceAPPROVED SOURCE" is modified by adding the words "or licensed engineer or architect" after the word "official."(12)(13)In IRC, Section R202, the following definition is added:  "CERTIFIED BACKFLOW PREVENTER ASSEMBLY TESTER: A person who has shown competence to test Backflow prevention assemblies to the satisfaction of the authority having jurisdiction under Utah Code, Subsection 19-4-104(4)."(13)(14)In IRC, Section R202, the definition of "Cross ConnectionCROSS CONNECTION" is deleted and replaced with the following:  "CROSS CONNECTION.  Any physical connection or potential connection or arrangement between two otherwise separate piping systems, one of which contains potable water and the other either water of unknown or questionable safety or steam, gas, or chemical, whereby there exists the possibility for flow from one system to the other, with the direction of flow depending on the pressure differential between the two systems (see "Backflow, Water Distribution")."(14)(15)In IRC, Section 202, the following definition is added:  "DUAL SOURCE CONNECTION. A pipe that is installed so that either the nonpotable (i.e. secondary) irrigation water or the potable water is connected to a pressurized irrigation system at one time, but not both at the same time; or a pipe that is installed so that either the potable water or private well water is connected to a residence at one time, but not both at the same time. The potable water supply line shall be protected by a reduced pressure backflow preventer."(15)(16)In IRC, Section 202, the following definition is added:  "ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEM (ESS). One or more devices, assembled together, that are capable of storing energy for supplying electrical energy at a future time."(16)(17)In IRC, Section 202, in the definition for gray water"GRAY WATER", a comma is inserted after the word "washers"; the word "and" is deleted; and the following is added to the end:  "and clear water wastes which have a pH of 6.0 to 9.0; are non-flammable; non-combustible; without objectionable odors; non-highly pigmented; and will not interfere with the operation of the sewer treatment facility."(17)(18)In IRC, Section R202, the definition of "Potable WaterPOTABLE WATER" is deleted and replaced with the following:  "POTABLE WATER.  Water free from impurities present in amounts sufficient to cause disease or harmful physiological effects and conforming to the Utah Code, Title 19, Chapter 4, Safe Drinking Water Act, and Title 19, Chapter 5, Water Quality Act, and the regulations of the public health authority having jurisdiction."(18)(19)In IRC, Figure R301.2 (3), is deleted and replaced with R301.2 (3) as follows:     "TABLE R301.2 (3)GROUND SNOW LOADS FOR SELECTED LOCATIONS IN UTAHCity/TownCountyGround Snow Load (lb/ft2)Elevation (ft)BeaverBeaver355886Brigham CityBox Elder424423Castle DaleEmery325669CoalvilleSummit575581DuchesneDuchesne395508FarmingtonDavis354318FillmoreMillard305138Heber CityWasatch605604JunctionPiute276030KanabKane254964LoaWayne377060LoganCache434531ManilaDaggett266368MantiSanpete375620MoabGrand214029MonticelloSan Juan677064MorganMorgan525062NephiJuab395131OgdenWeber374334PanguitchGarfield416630ParowanIron326007PriceCarbon315558ProvoUtah314541RandolphRich506286RichfieldSevier275338St. GeorgeWashington212585Salt Lake CitySalt Lake284239TooeleTooele355029VernalUintah395384Note: To convert lb/ft2 to kN/m2, multiply by 0.0479. To convert feet to meters, multiply by 0.3048.1. Statutory requirements of the Authority Having Jurisdiction are not included in this state ground snow load table.2. For locations where there is substantial change in altitude over the city/town, the load applies at and below the cited elevation, with a tolerance of 100 ft (30 m).3. For other locations in Utah, see Bean, B., Maguire, M., Sun, Y. (2018), "The Utah Snow Load Study," Utah State University Civil and Environmental Engineering Faculty Publications, Paper 3589, http://utahsnowload.usu.edu/, for ground snow load values."(19)(20)In IRC, Section R301.6, is deleted and replaced with the following:  "R301.6 Utah Snow Loads.  The snow loads specified in Table R301.2(5b) shall be used for the jurisdictions identified in that table.  Otherwise, for other locations in Utah, see Bean, B., Maguire, M., Sun, Y. (2018), "The Utah Snow Load Study," Utah State University Civil and Environmental Engineering Faculty Publications, Paper 3589, http://utahsnowload.usu.edu/, for ground snow load values."(20)(21)In IRC, Section R302.2, the following sentence is added at the end of the paragraph:  "When an access/maintenance agreement or easement is in place, plumbing, mechanical ducting, schedule 40 steel gas pipe, and electric service conductors including feeders, are permitted to penetrate the common wall at grade, above grade, or below grade."(21)(22)In IRC, Section R302.3, a new exceptionExemption 3 is added as follows:  "3. Accessory dwelling units separated by walls or floor assemblies protected by not less than 1/2-inch (12.7 mm) gypsum board or equivalent on each side of the wall or bottom of the floor assembly are exempt from the requirements of this section."(22)(23)In IRC, Section R302.5.1, the last sentence is deleted.(23)(24)In IRC, Section R302.13, is deleted.(24)(25)In IRC, Section R303.4, the following exception is added:  "Exception: Dwelling units tested in accordance with Section N1102.4.1.2 (R402.4.1.2) which has an air tightness of 3.0 ACH (50) or greater do not require mechanical ventilation."(25)(26)In IRC, Section R310.1, all words in the last sentence after "or to a yard or court", are deleted, and Exception 3 of this section is deleted.(26)(27)In IRC, Section R310.7, in the exception, the words "or accessory dwelling units" are added after the words "sleeping rooms".(27)(28)IRC, Sections R311.7.45R311.7.5.1 through R311.7.5.3, are deleted and replaced with the following:  "R311.7.45.1 Stair treads and risers. R311.7.5.1 R311.7.5.1 Riser height.  The maximum riser height shall be 8eight inches (203 mm).  The riser shall be measured vertically between leading edges of the adjacent treads.  The greatest riser height within any flight of stairs shall not exceed the smallest by more than 3/8 inch (9.5 mm).R311.7.5.2 Tread depth.  The minimum tread depth shall be 9nine inches (228 mm).  The tread depth shall be measured horizontally between the vertical planes of the foremost projection of adjacent treads and at a right angle to the tread's leading edge.  The greatest tread depth within any flight of stairs shall not exceed the smallest by more than 3/8 inch (9.5 mm).  Winder treads shall have a minimum tread depth of 10 inches (254 mm) measured as above at a point 12 inches (305 mm) from the side where the treads are narrower.  Winder treads shall have a minimum tread depth of 6six inches (152 mm) at any point.  Within any flight of stairs, the greatest winder tread depth at the 12-inch (305 mm) walk line shall not exceed the smallest by more than 3/8 inch (9.5 mm).R311.7.5.3 Nosing.  The radius of curvature at the leading edge of the tread shall be no greater than 9/16 inch (14.3 mm).  A nosing not less than 3/4 inch (19 mm) but not more than 1 1/4 inches (32 mm) shall be provided on stairways with solid risers.  The greatest nosing projection shall not exceed the smallest nosing projection by more than 3/8 inch (9.5 mm) between two stories, including the nosing at the level of floors and landings.  Beveling of nosing shall not exceed 1/2 inch (12.7 mm).  Risers shall be vertical or sloped from the underside of the leading edge of the tread above at an angle not more than 30 degrees (0.51 rad) from the vertical.  Open risers are permitted, provided that the opening between treads does not permit the passage of a 4-inch diameter (102 mm) sphere.Exceptions.1.  A nosing is not required where the tread depth is a minimum of 10 inches (254 mm).2.  The opening between adjacent treads is not limited on stairs with a total rise of 30 inches (762 mm) or less."(28)(29)In IRC, Section R312.2, is deleted.(29)(30)In IRC, Sections R313.1 through R313.2.1, are deleted and replaced with the following:  "R313.1 Design and installation.  When installed, automatic residential fire sprinkler systems for townhouses or one- and two-family dwellings shall be designed and installed in accordance with Section P2904 or NFPA 13D."(30)(31)In IRC, Section R314.2.2, the words "accessory dwelling units," are added after the words "Where alterations, repairs."(31)(32)In IRC, Section R315.2.2, the words "accessory dwelling units," are added after the words "Where alterations, repairs."(32)(33)In IRC, Section 315.3, the following words are added to the first sentence after the word "installed": "on each level of the dwelling unit and."(33)(34)A new IRC, Section R328.12, is added as follows:"R328.12 Signage. A sign located on the exterior of the dwelling shall be installed at a location approved by the authority having jurisdiction which identifies the battery chemistry included in the ESS. This sign shall be of sufficient durability to withstand the environment involved and shall not be handwritten."(34)(35)In IRC, Section 403.1.3.5.3, an exception is added as follows:  "Exception: Vertical steel in footings shall be permitted to be located while concrete is still plastic and before it has set. Where vertical steel resists placement or the consolidation of concrete around steel is impeded, the concrete shall be vibrated to ensure full contact between the vertical steel and concrete."(35)(36)In IRC, Section R403.1.6, a new Exception 3 is added as follows:  "3.  When anchor bolt spacing does not exceed 32 inches (813 mm) apart, anchor bolts may be placed with a minimum of two bolts per plate section located not less than 4four inches (102 mm) from each end of each plate section at interior bearing walls, interior braced wall lines, and at all exterior walls."(36)(37)In IRC, Section R403.1.6.1, a new exception is added at the end of Item 2 and Item 3 as follows:  "Exception: When anchor bolt spacing does not exceed 32 inches (816 mm) apart, anchor bolts may be placed with a minimum of two bolts per plate section located not less than 4four inches (102 mm) from each end of each plate section at interior bearing walls, interior braced wall lines, and at all exterior walls."(37)(38)In IRC, Section R404.1, a new exception is added as follows:  "Exception: As an alternative to complying with Sections R404.1 through R404.1.5.3, concrete and masonry foundation walls may be designed in accordance with IBC Sections 1807.1.5 and 1807.1.6 as amended in Section 1807.1.6.4 and Table 1807.1.6.4 under these rules."(38)(39)In IRC, Section R405.1, a second exception is added as follows:  "Exception: When a geotechnical report has been provided for the property, a drainage system is not required unless the drainage system is required as a condition of the geotechnical report. The geotechnical report shall make a recommendation regarding a drainage system."(39)(40)In IRC, Section R506.2.3, the words "10-mil (0.010 inch; 0.25 mm)" are deleted and replaced with "6-mil (0.006 inch; 0.152 mm)" and the words "conforming to ASTM E1745 Class A requirements" are deleted.(40)(41)In IRC, Section 507.2.1, Wood materials. The following sentence is added after the words, "in accordance with section R317," "field applied weather resistant barrier applied to the top of untreated material,".

Section 11:
Section 11. Section 15A-3-203 is amended to read:15A-3-203Effective 07/01/26. Amendments to Chapters 6 through 15 of IRC.(1)IRC, Section R609.4.1, is deleted.(2)IRC, Section R702.7, is deleted.(2)In IRC, Section N1101.4 (R102.1.1), a new section N1101.4.1 (R102.1.1) is added as follows: "N1101.4.1 National Green Building Standard. Buildings complying with ICC 700-2020 National Green Building Standard and achieving the Gold rating level for the energy efficiency category shall be deemed to exceed the energy efficiency required by this code. The building shall also meet the requirements identified in table N1105.2 and the building thermal envelope efficiency is greater than or equal to levels of efficiency and solar heat gain coefficients (SHGC) in Tables N1102.2.2 and N1102.1.3 of the 2009 IRC."(3)In IRC, Section N1101.5 (R103.2), all words after the words "herein governed." are deleted and replaced with the following: "Construction documents include all documentation required for building permits shall include only those items specified in Subsection 10-20-909(12) or 17-79-810(12) of the Utah  Code."(4)In IRC, Section N1101.10.3 (R303.1.3) the following changes are made:(a)The following is added at the end of the first sentence "or EN 14351-1:2006+A1:2010."(b)The word "accredited" is replaced with "approved" in the third sentence.(c)The following sentence is added after the third sentence:  "A conversion factor of 5.678 shall be used to convert from U values expressed in SI units: ()/53678=."(d)After "NFRC 200" the following words are added: "or EN 14351-1:2006+A1:2010," and in the sentence the word "accredited" is replaced with the word "approved."(e)The following new sentence shall be inserted immediately before the last sentence: "Total Energy Transmittance values may be substituted for SHGC, and Luminous Transmission values may be substituted for VT."(5)In IRC, Section N1101.12 (R303.3), all wording after the first sentence is deleted.(6)In IRC, Section N1101.13 (R401.2), in the first sentence, the words "Section N1101.13.5 and" are deleted.(7)In IRC, Section N1101.13.5 (R401.2.5) is deleted.(8)In IRC, Section N1101.14 (R401.3) Number 7, the words "and the compliance path used" are deleted.(9)In IRC, Table N1102.1.2 (R402.1.2):(a)in the column titled Fenestration U-Factor the following changes are made:(i)in the row titled "Climate Zone 3" delete 0.30 and replace it with 0.32;(ii)in the row titled "Climate Zone 5 and Marine 4" delete 0.30 and replace it with 0.32; and(iii)in the row titled "Climate Zone 6" delete 0.30 and replace it with 0.32;(b)in the column titled "Glazed Fenestration SHGC", the following change is made: in the row titled "Climate Zone 3" delete 0.25 and replace it with 0.35;(c)in the column titled "Ceiling U-Factor" the following changes are made:(i)in the row titled "Climate Zone 3" delete 0.026 and replace it with 0.030;(ii)in the row titled "Climate Zone 5 and Marine 4" delete 0.024 and replace it with 0.026; and(iii)in the row titled "Climate Zone 6" delete 0.024 and replace it with 0.026;(d)in the column titled "Wood Frame Wall U Factor", the following changes are made:(i)in the row titled "Climate Zone 3" delete 0.060 and replace it with 0.060;(ii)in the row titled "Climate Zone 5 and Marine 4" delete 0.045 and replace it with 0.060; and(iii)in the row titled "Climate Zone 6" delete 0.045 and replace it with 0.060;(e)in the column titled "Basement Wall U-Factor" the following changes are made:(i)in the row titled "Climate Zone 5 and Marine 4" delete 0.050 and replace it with 0.075; and(ii)in the row titled  "Climate Zone 6" delete 0.50 and replace it with 0.065; and(f)in the column titled "Crawl Space Wall U-Factor" the following changes are made:(i)in the row titled "Climate Zone 5 and Marine 4" delete 0.055 and replace it with 0.078; and(ii)in the row titled  "Climate Zone 6" delete 0.55 and replace it with 0.065.(10)In IRC, Table N1102.1.3 (R402.1.3), the following changes are made:(a)in the column titled "Wood Frame Walls R-Value" a new footnote indicator "j" is added and at the bottom of the footnotes the following footnote "j" is added: "j. In climate zone 3B and 5B, an R-15, and in climate zone 6, an R-20 shall be acceptable where air-impermeable insulation is installed in the cavity space, exterior continuous insulation, or some combination thereof; and the tested house air leakage is a maximum of 2.0 ACH50"; and(b)add a new footnote "k" as follows: "k. Log walls complying with ICC400 and with a minimum average wall thickness of 5 inches or greater shall be permitted in Zones 5 through 8 when overall window glazing has 0.30 U-factor or lower, minimum heating equipment efficiency is for gas 95 AFUE, or for oil, 84 AFUE, and all other components requirements are met."(11)In IRC, Table N1102.1.3 (R402.1.3) the following changes are made:(a)in the column titled "Fenestration U-Factor" the following changes are made:(i)in the row titled "Climate Zone 3" delete 0.30 and replace it with 0.32;(ii)in the row titled "Climate Zone 5 and Marine 4" delete 0.30 and replace it with 0.32; and(iii)in the row titled "Climate Zone 6" delete 0.30 and replace it with 0.32;(b)in the column titled "Glazed Fenestration SHGC" the following change is made: in the row titled "Climate Zone 3" delete 0.25 and replace it with 0.35;(c)in the Column R-Value the following changes are made:(i)in the row titled "Climate Zone 3" delete 49 and replace it with 38;(ii)in the row titled "Climate Zone 5 and Marine 4" delete 60 and replace it with 49; and(iii)in the row titled "Climate Zone 6" delete 60 and replace it with 49;(d)in the Column titled "Wood Frame Wall R-Value" the following changes are made:(i)in the row titled "Climate Zone 3" delete all values and replace with 20+Oci or 13+5ci or 015ci;(ii)in the row titled "Climate Zone 5 or Marine 4" delete all values and replace with 21+Oci or 15+5ci or 0+15ci; and(iii)in the row titled "Climate Zone 6" delete all values and replace with 21+Oci or 15+5ci or 0+15ci;(e)in the column titled "Basement Wall R Value" the following changes are made:(i)in the row titled "Climate Zone 5 or Marine 4" delete all values and replace with 15+Oci or 0+11ci or 11+5ci; and(ii)in the row titled "Climate Zone 6" delete all values and replace with 19+Oci or 0+13ci or 11+5ci;(f)in the column titled "Slab R Value and Depth" the following changes are made:(i)in the row titled "Climate Zone 3" delete 10ci. 2 ft and replace it with NR; and(ii)in the row titled "Climate Zone 5  Marine 4" delete 4 ft and replace it with 2 ft; and(g)in the column titled "Crawl Space Wall R-Value" the following changes are made:(i)in the row titled "Climate Zone 5 or Marine 4" delete all values and replace with 15+Oci or 0+11ci or 11+5ci; and(ii)in the row titled "Climate Zone 6" delete all values and replace with 19+Oci or 0+13ci or 0+11+5ci.(12)In IRC, a new subsection N1102.1.5.1 (R402.1.5.1) is added as follows: "1102.1.5.1 (R402.1.5.1) RESCheck 2012 Utah Energy Conservation Code. Compliance with section N1102.1.5 (R402.1.5) may be satisfied using the software RESCheck 2012 Utah Energy Conservation Code, which shall satisfy the R-value and U-factor requirements of N1102.1, N1102.2, and N1102.3, provided the following conditions are met:(a)in "Climate Zone 5 and 6" the software result shall show 5% better than code; and(b)in "Climate Zone 3", the software result shall show 5% better than code when software inputs for window U-factor .65 and window SHGC=0.40,  notwithstanding actual windows installed shall conform to requirements of Tables N1102.1.2 (R402.1.2) and N1102.1.3 (R402.1.3)."(13)In IRC, Sections N1102.2.1 (R402.2.1), a new Section N1102.2.1.1 is added as follows:"N1102.2.1.1. Unvented attic and unvented enclosed rafter assemblies. Unvented attic and unvented enclosed rafter assemblies conforming to Section R806.5 shall be provided with an R-value of R-22 (maximum U-Factor of 0.045) in Climate Zone 3-B or an R-value of R-26 (maximum U-factor of 0.038) in Climate Zones 5-B and 6-B shall be permitted provided all the following conditions are met:1. The unvented attic assembly complies with the requirements of the International Residential Code, R806.5.2. The house shall attain a blower door test result  2.5ACH 50.3. The house shall require a whole house mechanical ventilation system that does not rely solely on a negative pressure strategy (must be positive, balanced or hybrid).4. Where insulation is installed below the roof deck and the exposed portion of roof rafters are not already covered by the R-20 depth of the air-impermeable insulation, the exposed portion of the roof rafters shall be wrapped (covered) by minimum R-3 unless directly covered by drywall/finished ceiling. Roof rafters are not required to be covered by minimum R-3 if a continuous insulation is installed above the roof deck.5. Indoor heating, cooling and ventilation equipment (including ductwork) shall be inside the building thermal envelope."(14)In IRC, Section N1102.2.9.1 (R402.2.9.1) the numeral (i) is added before the words "cut at a 45 degree" and the following is added after the words "exterior wall": "or (ii) lowered from top of slab 4" when a 4" thermal break material such as, but not limited to, felt or asphalt impregnated fiber board, with a minimum thickness of 1/4" is installed at the upper 4" of slab".(15)In IRC, Section N1102.4.1 (R402.4.1), in the first sentence, the word "and" is deleted and replaced with the word "or."(16)In IRC, Section N1102.4.1.1 (R402.4.1.1), the last sentence is deleted and replaced with the following: "Where allowed by the code official, the builder may certify compliance to components criteria for items which may not be inspected during regularly scheduled inspections."(17)In IRC, Table N1102.4.1.1 (R402.4.1.1) in the column titled "COMPONENT, the following changes are made:(a)In the row "Rim Joists" the word "exterior" in the first sentence is deleted, and the second sentence is deleted.(b)In the row "Electrical/phone box on the exterior walls" the last sentence is deleted and replaced with: "Alternatively, close cell foam, caulking or gaskets may be used, or air sealed boxes may be installed."(18)In IRC, Section N1102.4.1.2 (R402.4.1.2), the following changes are made:(a)In the fourth sentence, the word "third" is deleted.(b)The following sentence is added after the fourth sentence: "The following parties shall be approved to conduct testing: Parties certified by BPI or RESNET, or licensed contractors who have completed training provided by Blower Door Test equipment manufacturers or other comparable training."(c)In the first Exception the second sentence is deleted.(19)IRC, Section N1103.3.3 (R403.3.3), is deleted.(20)IRC Section N1103.3.3.1 (R403.3.3.1) is deleted.(21)In IRC, Section N1103.3.5 (R403.3.5), the following changes are made:(a)a second Exception is added as follows: "A duct leakage test shall not be required for any system designed such that no air handlers or ducts are located within unconditioned attics."; and(b)the following is added at the end of the section: "The following parties shall be approved to conduct testing:(i)Parties certified by BPT or RESNET; and(ii)Licensed contractors who have completed training provided by Duct Test equipment manufacturers or other comparable training."(22)In IRC, Section N1103.3.6 (R403.3.6) the following changes are made:(a)in Subsection 1:(i)the number 4.0 is changed to 6.0;(ii)the number 113.3 is changed to 170;(iii)the number 3.0 is changed to 5.0; and(iv)the number 85 is changed to 141;(b)in Subsection 2:(i)the number 4.0 is changed to 5.0; and(ii)the number 113.3 is changed to 141; and(c)Subsection 3 is deleted.(23)In IRC, Section N1103.3.7 (R403.3.7) the words "or plenums" are deleted.(24)In IRC, Section N1103.5.1.1 (R403.5.1.1) the words "Where installed" are added at the beginning of the first sentence.(25)In IRC, Section N1103.5.2 (R403.5.2) the following change is made, Subsections 5 and 6 are deleted and Subsection 7 is renumbered to 5.(26)IRC, Section N1103.6.2 (R403.6.2), is deleted and replaced with the following: "N1103.6.2 (R403.6.2) Whole-house mechanical ventilation system fan efficacy. Fans used to provide whole-house mechanical ventilation shall meet the efficacy requirements of Table N1103.6.2 (R403.6.2).Exception: Where an air handler that is integral to tested and listed HVAC equipment is used to provide whole-house mechanical ventilation, the air handler shall be powered by an electronically commutated motor."(27)In IRC, Section N1103.6.2 (R403.6.2), the table is deleted and replaced with the following:"TABLE N1103.6.2 (R403.6.2)",MECHANICAL VENTILATION SYSTEM FAN EFFICACY     FAN LOCATIONAIR FLOW RATE MINIMUM (CFM)MINIMUM EFFICACY (CFM/WATT)AIR FLOW RATE MAXIMUM (CFM)HRV or ERVAny1.2 cfm/wattAnyRange hoodsAny2.8 cfm/wattAnyIn-line fanAny2.8 cfm/wattAnyBathroom, utility room101.4 cfm/watt90Bathroom, utility room902.8 cfm/wattAny"(28)IRC, Section N1103.6.3 (R403.6.3) is deleted.(29)In IRC, Section N1103.7 (R403.7) the word "approved" is deleted in the first sentence and the following is added after the word "methodologies": "complying with N1103.7.1 (R403.7.1)".(30)A new IRC, Section N1103.7.1 (R403.7.1) is added as follows: "N1103.7.1 Qualifications. An individual performing load calculations shall be qualified by completing HVAC training from one of the following:1. HVAC load calculation education from ACCA;2. A recognized educational institution;3. HVAC equipment manufacturer's training; or4. Other recognized industry certification."(31)In IRC, Section N1104.1 (R404.1), the word "All" is replaced with "Not less than 90 percent of the lamps in".(32)IRC, Section N1104.1.1 (R404.1.1) is deleted.(33)IRC, Section N1104.2 (R404.2) is deleted.(34)IRC, Section N1104.3 (R404.3) is deleted.(35)In IRC, section N1105.2 (R405.2) the following changes are made:(a)In Subsection 3, the words "approved by the code official" are deleted; and(b)In Subsection 3, the following words are added at the end of the sentence: "when applicable and readily available".(36)In IRC, Section N1106.3 (R406.3) "Building thermal envelope" is deleted, and replaced with "Building thermal envelope and on-site renewables. The proposed total building thermal envelope UA, which is the sum of U-factor times assembly area, shall be less than or equal to the building thermal envelope UA using the prescriptive U-factors from Table N1102.1.2 multiplied by 1.15 in accordance with Equation 11-4. The area-weighted maximum fenestration SHGC permitted in Climate Zones 0 through 3 shall be: 0.30.UAProposed design =1.15xUAPrescriptive reference design (Equation 11-4)."(37)In IRC, Section N1106.3.1 (R406.3.1) is deleted.(38)In IRC, Section N1106.3.2 (R403.3.2) is deleted.(39)In IRC, Section N1106.4 (R406.4) the following changes are made:(a)In the first sentence, the words "in accordance with Equation 11-5" are deleted and replaced with: "permitted to be calculated using the minimum total air exchange rate for the rated home (Qtot) and for the index adjustment factor in accordance with Equation 11.5.";(b)In equation 11-5, the words "Ventilation rate, CFM" are deleted and replaced with: "Qtot"; and(c)In the last sentence the number "5" is deleted and replaced with "15".(40)In IRC N1106.5, in the column titled "ENERGY RATING INDEX" of Table R406.5, the following changes are made:(a)In the row for "Climate Zone 3", "51" is deleted and replaced with "65";(b)In the row for "Climate Zone 5", "55" is deleted and replaced with "69"; and(c)In the row for "Climate Zone 6", "54" is deleted and replaced with "68".(41)In IRC, Section N1108 (R408) is deleted.(42)(3)In IRC, Chapter 11, is deleted and replaced with the following:"Chapter 11, Energy Efficiency (Revised)R1101.1 Scope. This chapter establishes minimum thermal-performance requirements for the building envelope of residential structures regulated by this code.R1101.2 General. The building envelope shall be constructed to limit heat loss and gain through its components by providing insulation values not less than those specified in this chapter.R1101.3 Compliance Paths. Compliance with this chapter shall be demonstrated by one of the following methods:R1101.3.1 Prescriptive Compliance. The building thermal envelope shall meet or exceed the minimum R-values and maximum U-factors in Section R1102.2.R1101.3.2 Performance Compliance. As an alternative to Section R1101.3.1, compliance may be demonstrated using U.S. DOE REScheck, provided the proposed design achieves an overall envelope performance not less than 5%  above the current Utah 2012 REScheck standard, as documented on the REScheck compliance certificate or achieve a HERs rating of 67 or better.R1102.1 Building Thermal Envelope. The building thermal envelope shall include exterior walls, roof/ceiling assemblies, floors over unconditioned spaces, windows, doors, and other elements that enclose conditioned space.R1102.2 Minimum Thermal Resistance (R-Values) and U-Factors. Insulation for each component of the building envelope shall meet or exceed the following minimum R-values and U-factors:    ComponentMinimum R-Value/Maximum U-FactorNotesAbove-grade exterior wallsR-21Applies to all framed or masonry walls separating conditioned and unconditioned space or the exterior environment.Ceilings / roof assembliesR-38Applies to the thermal boundary between conditioned space and unconditioned attic or exterior air.Floors over unconditioned spaceR-30Includes floors over crawl spaces, garages, or open air.Basement walls (conditioned basements)R-10 continuous or R-13 cavityRequired for any portion of basement walls enclosing conditioned space.Windows and glazed doorsMaximum U-factor = 0.32Applies to all fenestration enclosing conditioned space.SkylightsMaximum U-factor = 1.3Applies to all skylights over conditioned space.Opaque doorsMinimum U-factor = 0.6Applies to solid doors separating conditioned and unconditioned spaces.R1102.2.1 Conversion for Imported Windows and Doors. A conversion factor of 5.678 shall be used to convert U-values expressed in SI units to IP units: U(IP) = U(SI) / 5.678.R1102.3 Installation. Insulation materials shall be installed in substantial contact with the surface they are intended to insulate and in accordance with the manufacturer's instructions. Compressed or poorly fitted insulation shall not be permitted where it reduces effective thermal resistance.R1102.4 Verification. Compliance with the requirements of this chapter shall be verified by inspection prior to the installation of interior finishes. No additional energy modeling, trade-off analysis, or performance-based documentation shall be required.R1103 Mechanical Room Requirements. Mechanical rooms that receive combustion air from unconditioned space shall be insulated and sealed to prevent uncontrolled air infiltration. Such rooms shall:be separated from unconditioned spaces by an insulated thermal barrier equal to the minimum wall R-value of R13; and  be sealed to limit air leakage through joints, penetrations, and construction openings with the air-sealing provisions.R1104 Duct System Testing and Insulation.R1104.1 Duct Leakage Testing. Duct systems located in unconditioned attics shall be tested for total air leakage.R1104.1.1 Air Handler Installed at Time of Test. Where the air handler is installed at the time of the leakage test, the total leakage shall be less than or equal to 6.0 cubic feet per minute (170 L/min) per 100 square feet (9.29 m) of conditioned floor area.R1104.1.2 Air Handler Not Installed at Time of Test. Where the air handler is not installed at the time of the test, the total leakage shall be less than or equal to 5.0 cubic feet per minute (141 L/min) per 100 square feet (9.29 m) of conditioned floor area.R1104.2 Duct Insulation. Duct systems located outside conditioned space shall be insulated to a minimum of R-8. Ducts buried beneath concrete floors do not require insulation.R1104.1.3 Building Thermal Envelope Air Leakage Testing. The building thermal envelope shall be tested to determine air leakage rate. Testing shall be conducted in accordance with ASTM E779 or ASTM E1827. A written report of the results of the test shall be signed by the party conducting the test and shall be provided to the code official. Testing shall be performed at a pressure differential of 0.2 inch water gauge (50 Pascals).R1104.1.3.1 Mechanical Ventilation. Where the tested air leakage rate is not greater than 3 air changes per hour, the dwelling unit shall be provided with whole-house mechanical ventilation in accordance with Section M1505.R1104.1.3.2 Mechanical Ventilation as an Alternative. In lieu of the testing required by Section R1104.1.3, the dwelling unit shall be provided with mechanical ventilation in accordance with Section M1505.R1105 Building Thermal Envelope Air Leakage Testing. The building thermal envelope shall be tested to determine air leakage rate. The maximum air leakage rate shall not exceed 5.0 air changes per hour or 0.25 cubic feet per minute (CFM) per square foot [0.00127 m3/(s x m2)] of dwelling unit enclosure area for single family construction and 6.0 air changes per hour or 0.28 cubic feet per minute (CFM) per square foot [0.0079 m3/(s x m2)] of dwelling unit enclosure area for multifamily construction.Testing shall be conducted in accordance with ASTM E779 or ASTM E1827. A written report of the results of the test shall be signed by the party conducting the test and shall be provided to the code official. Testing shall be performed at a pressure differential of 0.2 inch water gauge (50 Pascals).The following parties shall be approved to conduct testing: Parties certified by BPI or RESNET, or licensed contractors who have completed training provided by Blower Door Test equipment manufacturers or other comparable training.Exception to air leakage testing: Table R41105 may be used as an alternative to conducting air leakage testing.  Table R41105: Air Barrier, Air Sealing, and Insulation Installation ChecklistInsulation and air barriers installed in accordance with  manufacturers instructions.Air-permeable insulation (fiberglass, rock-wool, cellulose) is not used for air sealing.Closed-cell foam is the only insulation that also serves as an air barrier.Continuous air barrier installed at the building thermal envelope. Breaks  joints sealed.Dropped ceilings/soffits, shafts, and chases shall be capped with an air barrier lid and sealed (attic insulation does not drop down into soffits).Walls shall be framed to allow insulation in corners and in headers.Wall insulation shall be enclosed on 6 sides. Includes an air barrier, backside of knee-walls.Wall batt insulation shall be cut all pipes, wiring and boxes in cavity (recommend blown insulation).All gaps and voids sealed between conditioned and un-conditioned spaces, including garages, crawlspaces, around windows and doors, and all penetrations.Rim joist insulation shall include a sealed air barrier on the inside face of insulation, or closed cell spray foam.Floor insulation in contact with sheathing/lid below. Air barrier underside of cantilevers. Fill floor cavities  rooms over garages.Recessed can lights, boxes and HVAC boots penetrating the thermal envelope shall be sealed.Air barrier behind electrical boxes or closed cell foam,  caulk, gaskets, or air sealed boxes.Exterior walls adjacent to fireplaces, tubs, showers shall include an inside surface air barrier."(4)In IRC, Section M1401.3 the word "approved" is deleted in the first sentence and the following is added after the word "methodologies ,", "complying with M1401.3.1.".(43)(5)A new IRC, Section M1401.3.1, is added as follows:  "M1401.3.1 Qualifications. An individual performing load calculations shall be qualified by completing HVAC training from one of the following:1. HVAC load calculation education from ACCA;2. A recognized educational institution;3. HVAC equipment manufacturer's training; or4. Other recognized industry certification."(44)(6)In IRC, Section M1402.1, the following is added at the end of the second sentence: "or UL/CSA 60335-2-40."(45)(7)In IRC, Section M1403.1, the characters "/ANCE" are deleted.(46)(8)IRC, Section M1411.9, is deleted.(47)(9)In IRC, Section M1412.1, the characters "/ANCE" are deleted.(48)(10)In IRC, Section M1413.1, the characters "/ANCE" are deleted.

Section 12:
Section 12. Section 15A-3-204 is amended to read:15A-3-204Effective 07/01/26. Amendments to Chapters 16 through 25 of IRC.(1)In IRC, Section M1602.2, a new exception is added at the end of Item 7 as follows:  "Exception: The discharge of return air from an accessory dwelling unit into another dwelling unit, or into an accessory dwelling unit from another dwelling unit, is not prohibited." (2)A new IRC, Section G2401.2, is added as follows:  "G2401.2 Meter Protection.  Fuel gas services shall be in an approved location and/or provided with structures designed to protect the fuel gas meter and surrounding piping from physical damage, including falling, moving, or migrating ice and snow.  If an added structure is used, it mustshall provide access for service and comply with the IBC or the IRC."(3)In IRC, Section 2503.5.1, #2 Air Test is deleted and replaced with the following:  "Where water is not available at the construction site or where freezing conditions limit the use of water on the construction site, plastic drainage and vent pipe may be permitted to be tested with air. The following procedures shall be followed:(a)Proper personal protective equipment, including safety eyewear and protective headgear, should be worn by all individuals in any area where an air or gas test is being conducted.(b)Contractor shall take all precautions necessary to limit the pressure within the plastic piping.(c)No drain and vent system shall be pressurized in excess of 6 psi as measured by accurate gauges graduated to no more than three times the test pressure.(d)The pressure gauge shall be monitored during the test period, which should not exceed 15 minutes.(e)At the conclusion of the test, the system shall be depressurized gradually, all trapped air or gases should be vented, and test balls and plugs should be removed with caution."(4)In IRC, Section P2503.8, the word "devices" is deleted and replaced with the word "assemblies."(5)IRC, Section P2503.8.2, is deleted and replaced with the following:  "P2503.2 Testing. Reduced pressure principle, double check, pressure vacuum breaker, reduced pressure detector fire protection, double check detector fire protections, and spill-resistant vacuum breaker backflow preventer assemblies shall be tested at the time of installation, immediately after repairs or relocation and at least annually. The Utah Cross-Connection Control CommissionUtah Division of Drinking Water has adopted the field test procedures published by the Manual of Cross Connection Control, Tenth Edition. This manual is published by the University of Southern California's Foundation for Cross-Connection Control and Hydraulic Research.  Test gauges shall comply with ASSE 1064."

Section 13:
Section 13. Section 15A-3-205 is amended to read:15A-3-205Effective 07/01/26. Amendments to Chapters 26 through 35 of IRC.(1)IRC, Section P2602.1, is deleted and replaced with the following:   "P2602.1 General. The water-distribution system of any building or premises where plumbing fixtures are installed shall be connected to a public water supply. Where a potable public water supply is not available, individual sources of potable water supply shall be utilized provided that the source has been developed in accordance with Utah Code Sections 73-3-1, 73-3-3, and 73-3-25, as administered by the Department of Natural Resources, Division of Water Rights. In addition, the quality of the water shall be approved by the local health department having jurisdiction. The source shall supply sufficient quantity of water to comply with the requirements of this chapter.Every building in which plumbing fixtures are installed and all premises having drainage piping shall be connected to a public sewer where the sewer is accessible and is within 300 feet of the property line in accordance with Utah Code Section 10-8-38, or an approved private sewage disposal system in accordance with Utah Administrative Code, Rule R317-4, as administered by the Department of Environmental Quality, Division of Water Quality.Exception: Sanitary drainage piping and systems that convey only the discharge from bathtubs, showers, lavatories, clothes washers, and laundry trays shall not be required to connect to a public sewer or to a private sewage disposal system provided that the piping or systems are connected to a system in accordance with Sections P2910 or P2911."(2)A new IRC, Section P2602.3, is added as follows:  "P2602.3 Individual water supply.  Where a potable public water supply is not available, individual sources of potable water supply shall be utilized, provided that the source has been developed in accordance with Utah Code, Sections 73-3-1 and 73-3-25, as administered by the Department of Natural Resources, Division of Water Rights.  In addition, the quality of the water shall be approved by the local health department having jurisdiction."(3)A new IRC, Section P2602.4, is added as follows:  "P2602.4 Sewer required.  Every building in which plumbing fixtures are installed and all premises having drainage piping shall be connected to a public sewer where the sewer is accessible and is within 300 feet of the property line in accordance with Utah Code, Section 10-8-38; or an approved private sewage disposal system in accordance with Utah Administrative Code, Chapter 4, Rule R317, as administered by the Department of Environmental Quality, Division of Water Quality."(4)In IRC, Section P2705, Item 5, the words "lavatory" and "lavatories" are deleted.(5)In IRC, Section P2705, a new Item 9 is added as follows and the remaining item numbers are renumbered accordingly: "9. Lavatories. A lavatory shall not be set closer than 12 inches from its center to any side wall or partition. A lavatory shall be provided with a clearance of 24 inches in width and 21 inches in depth in front of the lavatory to any side wall, partition, or obstruction." Remaining item numbers are renumbered accordingly.(6)In IRC, Section P2801.6.2, the following is added at the end of the section:  "When permitted by the code official, the pan drain may be directly connected to a soil stack, waste stack, or branch drain. The pan drain shall be individually trapped and vented as required in Section 907.1. The pan drain shall not be directly or indirectly connected to any vent. The trap shall be provided with a trap primer conforming to ASSE 1018 or ASSE 1044, a barrier type floor drain trap seal protection device meeting ASSE 1072, or a deep seal p-trap."(7)A new IRC, Section P2801.6.3, is added as follows:  "P2801.6.3 Pan designation. A water heater pan shall be considered an emergency receptor designated to receive the discharge of water from the water heater only and shall not receive the discharge from any other fixtures, devises, or equipment."(8)IRC, Section P2801.8, is deleted and replaced with the following:  "P2801.8 Water heater seismic bracing. As a minimum requirement, water heaters shall be anchored or strapped to resist horizontal displacement caused by earthquake motion. Strapping shall be at points within the upper one-third and lower one-third of the appliance's vertical dimensions.(9)In IRC, Section P2804.6.1, a new number 15 is added as follows:  "15. Be installed in accordance with the manufacturer's installation instructions, not to exceed 180 degrees in directional changes."(10)A new IRC, Section P2902.1.1, is added as follows:  "P2902.1.1 Backflow assembly testing. Reduced pressure principle, double check, pressure vacuum breaker, reduced pressure detector fire protection, double check detector fire protection, and spill-resistant vacuum breaker backflow preventer assemblies shall be tested at the time of installation, immediately after repairs or relocation and at least annually. The Utah Cross Connection Control CommissionDivision of Drinking Water has adopted the field test procedures published by the Manual of Cross Connection Control, Tenth Edition. This manual is published by the University of Southern California's Foundation for Cross-Connection Control and Hydraulic Research. Test gauges shall comply with ASSE 1064."(11)In IRC, Section P2902.1, the following subsections are added as follows:"P2902.1.1 General Installation Criteria.Assemblies shall not be installed more than five feet above the floor unless a permanent platform is installed.  The assembly owner, where necessary, shall provide devices or structures to facilitate testing, repair, and maintenance, and to insure the safety of the backflow technician.P2902.1.2 Specific Installation Criteria.P2902.1.3 Reduced Pressure Principle Backflow Prevention Assembly.The reduced pressure principle backflow prevention assembly shall be installed as follows:a. The assembly may not be installed in a pit or below grade where the relief port could be submerged in water or where fumes could be present at the relief port discharge.b. The relief valve of the assembly shall not be directly connected to a waste disposal line, including a sanitary sewer, a storm drain, or a vent.c. The assembly shall be installed in a horizontal position only, unless listed or approved for vertical installation in accordance with Section 303.4 of the International Plumbing Code as amended in Utah Code, Subsection 15A-3-303(1).d. The bottom of the assembly shall be installed a minimum of 12 inches above the floor or ground.e. The body of the assembly shall be a minimum of 12 inches from any wall, ceiling, or obstacle, and shall be readily accessible for testing, repair, and maintenance.P2902.1.4 Double Check Valve Backflow Prevention Assembly.A double check valve backflow prevention assembly shall be installed as follows:a. The assembly shall be installed in a horizontal position only, unless listed or approved for vertical installation.b. The bottom of the assembly shall be a minimum of 12 inches above the ground or floor.c. The body of the assembly shall be a minimum of 12 inches from any wall, ceiling, or obstacle, and shall be readily accessible for testing, repair, and maintenance.d. If installed in a pit, the assembly shall be installed with a minimum of 12 inches of clearance between all sides of the vault, including the floor and roof or ceiling, with adequate room for testing and maintenance.P2902.1.5 Pressure Vacuum Break Assembly and Spill Resistant Pressure Vacuum Breaker Assembly.A pressure vacuum break assembly or a spill resistant pressure vacuum breaker assembly shall be installed as follows:a. The assembly shall not be installed in an area that could be subject to backpressure or back drainage conditions.b. The assembly shall be installed a minimum of 12 inches above all downstream piping and the highest point of use.c. The assembly shall be a minimum of 12 inches from any wall, ceiling, or obstacle, and shall be readily accessible for testing, repair, and maintenance.d. The assembly shall not be installed below ground, in a vault, or in a pit.e. The assembly shall be installed in a vertical position."(12)In IRC, Table 2903.2, the following changes are made in the column titled "MAXIMUM FLOW RATE OR QUANTITY":(a)In the row titled "Lavatory faucet" the text is deleted and replaced with "1.5 gpm at 60 psi.".(b)In the row titled "Shower head" the text is deleted and replaced with "2 gpm at 80 psi.".(13)In IRC, Section P2903.3, the words "public water main or an" are deleted and the following sentence is added at the end:  "A water pressure booster pump may not be connected to a public water main unless allowed by Utah Administrative Code, Rule R309-540."(14)In IRC, Section 2903.5, at the beginning of the second sentence, insert "If installed,".(15)In IRC, Section P2903.9.3, the first sentence is deleted and replaced with the following:  "Unless the plumbing appliance or plumbing fixture has a wall-mount valve, shutoff valves shall be required on each fixture supply pipe to each plumbing appliance and to each plumbing fixture other than bathtubs and showers."(16)IRC, Section P2910.5, is deleted and replaced with the following:"P2910.5 Potable water connections.A system that utilizes nonpotable water (i.e., pressurized irrigation) and installs a connection to the potable water system for backup mustshall install a Reduced Pressure Principle Assembly (RP) directly downstream of the potable water connection (Stop and Waste) and install a "dual source connection" directly downstream from the (RP) installed so that either the potable water system or the nonpotable water is connected at any time to prevent a direct Cross Connection and to protect the potable water from any potential hazard from the nonpotable water system. See Utah Code Section 19-4-112. Note: RP mustshall be tested within 10 days of installation and annually whether the drinking water is used or not."(17)IRC, Section P2910.9.5, is deleted and replaced with the following:"P2910.9.5 Makeup water.Where an uninterrupted nonpotable water supply is required for the intended application, potable or reclaimed water shall be provided as a source of makeup water for the storage tank.  The makeup water supply shall be protected against backflow by means of an air gap not less than 4four inches (102 millimeters) above the overflow or by a reduced pressure backflow prevention assembly installed in accordance with Section 2902."(18)In IRC, Section P2911.12.4, the following words are deleted: "and backwater valves."(19)In IRC, Section P2912.15.6, the following words are deleted: "and backwater valves."(20)In IRC, Section P3007.3.3.1, the words "stainless steel, cast iron, galvanized steel, brass" are added after the word "PE."(21)IRC, Section P3009, is deleted and replaced with the following:"P3009 Graywater soil absorption systems: Graywater recycling systems utilized for subsurface irrigation for single-family residences shall comply with the requirements of Utah Administrative Code, R317-401, Graywater Systems. Graywater recycling systems utilized for subsurface irrigation for other occupancies shall comply with Utah Administrative Code, R317-3, Design Requirements for Wastewater Collection, Treatment, and Disposal Systems, and Utah Administrative Code, R317-4, Onsite Wastewater Systems."(22)In IRC, Section P3101.4, the following sentence is added at the end of the paragraph:  "Vents extending through the wall shall terminate not less than 12 inches from the wall with an elbow pointing downward."(23)In IRC, Section P3104.4, the following sentence is added at the end of the paragraph:  "Horizontal dry vents below the flood level rim shall be permitted for floor drain and floor sink installations when installed below grade in accordance with Chapter 30, and Sections P3104.2 and P3104.3.  A wall cleanout shall be provided in the vertical vent."(24)In IRC, Section E3401.2, the second sentence is modified by adding the words "townhouses", after the word "dwellings" and the word "their" before the word "accessory" and the following is added after "NFPA 70", "such as, but not limited to the following equipment:(a)fixed outdoor electric deicing and snow-melting equipment;(b)motors;(c)generators;(d)transformers;(e)phase converters;(f)stationary standby batteries;(g)elevators;(h)dumbwaiters;(i)platform lifts;(j)stairway chairlifts;(k)electric vehicle power transfer systems;(l)electric welders;(m)audio signal processing, amplification, and reproduction equipment;(n)information technology equipment;(o)solar photovoltaic (PV) systems;(p)optional standby systems;(q)interconnected electric power production sources;(r)energy storage systems; and(s)energy management systems."

Section 14:
Section 14. Section 15A-3-302 is amended to read:15A-3-302Effective 07/01/26. Amendments to Chapters 1 and 2 of IPC.(1)In IPC, Section 202, the following definition is added:  "Utah Certified Backflow Preventer Assembly Tester.  A person who has shown competence to test Backflow prevention assemblies to the satisfaction of the authority having jurisdiction under Utah Code, Subsection 19-4-104(4) and Utah Administrative Code, R309-305."(2)In IPC, Section 202, the definition for "Cross Connection" is deleted and replaced with the following:  "Cross Connection.  Any physical connection or potential connection or arrangement between two otherwise separate piping systems, one of which contains potable water and the other either water of unknown or questionable safety or steam, gas, or chemical, whereby there exists the possibility for flow from one system to the other, with the direction of flow depending on the pressure differential between the two systems (see "Backflow")."(3)In IPC, Section 202, the following definition is added:  "Deep Seal Trap.  A manufactured or field fabricated trap with a liquid seal of 4" or larger."(4)In IPC, Section 202, the definition for "Essentially Nontoxic Transfer Fluid" is deleted and replaced with the following:"ESSENTIALLY NONTOXIC TRANSFER FLUID.  Fluids, including propylene glycol and mineral oil."(5)In IPC, Section 202, the definition for "Essentially Toxic Transfer Fluid" is deleted and replaced with the following:"ESSENTIALLY TOXIC TRANSFER FLUID.  Soil, waste, or gray water; and any fluid that is not an essentially nontoxic transfer fluid under this code."(6)In IPC, Section 202, the following definition is added:  "Motor Vehicle Waste Disposal Well. An injection well that discharges to the subsurface by way of a floor drain, septic system, French drain, dry well, or similar system that receives or has received fluid from a facility engaged in vehicular repair or maintenance activities, including an auto body repair shop, automotive repair shop, new and used car dealership, speciality repair shop, or any other facility that does any vehicular repair work. A motor vehicle waste disposal well is subject to rulemaking under Section 19-5-104 regarding underground injection."(7)In IPC, Section 202, the definition for "Potable Water" is deleted and replaced with the following:  "Potable Water.  Water free from impurities present in amounts sufficient to cause disease or harmful physiological effects and conforming to the Utah Code, Title 19, Chapter 4, Safe Drinking Water Act, and Title 19, Chapter 5, Water Quality Act, and the regulations of the public health authority having jurisdiction."(8)In IPC, Section 202, the following definition is added for Dual Source Connectiondual source connection: "Dual Source ConnectionDUAL SOURCE CONNECTION. A pipe that is installed so that either the nonpotable (i.e. secondary) irrigation water or the potable water is connected to a pressurized irrigation system at one time, but not both at the same time; or a pipe that is installed so that either the potable water or private well water is connected to a residence at one time, not both at the same time. The potable water supply line shall be protected by a reduced pressure backflow preventer."(9)In IPC, Section 202, the definition for individual water supply is deleted and replaced with the following:"INDIVIDUAL WATER SUPPLY. A water supply that is not served by a Public Water System, as defined by Utah Administrative Code, R309-100."(10)In IPC, Section 202, the definition for public water main is deleted and replaced with the following:"PUBLIC WATER MAIN. A water supply pipe owned by a Public Water System, as defined in Utah Administrative Code, R309-100."(11)In IPC, Section 202, the following definition is added for public water supply:"PUBLIC WATER SUPPLY. A water supply that is served by a Public Water System, as defined in Utah Administrative Code, R309-100."

Section 15:
Section 15. Section 15A-3-303 is amended to read:15A-3-303Effective 07/01/26. Amendments to Chapter 3 of IPC.(1)In IPC, Section 303.4, the following exception is added:"Exception: Third-party standards and certification for approval of backflow prevention assemblies willshall consist of any combination of two certifications, laboratory or field.  Acceptable third party laboratory certifying agencies are ASSE, IAPMO, and USC-FCCCHR.  USC-FCCCHR currently provides the only field testing of backflow protection assemblies.  approvals from a third-party laboratory, and a recognized listed organization that performs a laboratory performance evaluation and a one-year field performance evaluation. Also see www.drinkingwater.utah.gov and Division of Drinking Water Rule, Utah Administrative Code, R309-105-12(4)."(2)IPC, Section 311.1, is deleted.(3)(2)In IPC, Section 306.2.4, the following sentence is added after the last sentence:"Access shall be provided to the tracer wire at both ends or both ends of the tracer wire shall be terminated at the cleanout."(3)In IPC, Section 312.3, the following is added at the end of the paragraph:"Where water is not available at the construction site or where freezing conditions limit the use of water on the construction site, plastic drainage and vent pipe may be permitted to be tested with air.  The following procedures shall be followed:1.  Contractor shall recognize that plastic is extremely brittle at lower temperatures and can explode, causing serious injury or death.2.  Contractor assumes all liability for injury or death to persons or damage to property or for claims for labor and/or material arising from any alleged failure of the system during testing with air or compressed gasses.3.  Proper personal protective equipment, including safety eyewear and protective headgear, should be worn by all individuals in any area where an air or gas test is being conducted.4.  Contractor shall take all precautions necessary to limit the pressure within the plastic piping.5.  No drain and vent system shall be pressurized in excess of 6 psi as measured by accurate gauges graduated to no more than three times the test pressure.6.  The pressure gauge shall be monitored during the test period, which should not exceed 15 minutes.7.  At the conclusion of the test, the system shall be depressurized gradually, all trapped air or gases should be vented, and test balls and plugs should be removed with caution."(4)In IPC, Section 312.5Section 312.6, the following is added at the end of the paragraph:"Where water is not available at the construction site or where freezing conditions limit the use of water on the construction site, plastic water pipes may be permitted to be tested with air.  The following procedures shall be followed:1.  Contractor shall recognize that plastic is extremely brittle at lower temperatures and can explode, causing serious injury or death.2.  Contractor assumes all liability for injury or death to persons or damage to property or for claims for labor and/or material arising from any alleged failure of the system during testing with air or compressed gasses.3.  Proper personal protective equipment, including safety eyewear and protective headgear, should be worn by all individuals in any area where an air or gas test is being conducted.4.  Contractor shall take all precautions necessary to limit the pressure within the plastic piping.5.  Water supply systems shall be pressure tested to a minimum of 50 psi but not more than 80 psi as measured by accurate gauges graduated to no more than three times the test pressure.6.  The pressure gauge shall be monitored during the test period, which should not exceed 15 minutes.7.  At the conclusion of the test, the system shall be depressurized gradually, all trapped air or gases should be vented, and test balls and plugs should be removed with caution."(5)IPC, Section 312.10.2Section 312.11.2, is deleted and replaced with the following:"312.10.2312.11.2 Testing. Reduced pressure principle, double check, pressure vacuum breaker, reduced pressure detector fire protection, double check detector fire protection, and spill-resistant vacuum breaker backflow preventer assemblies shall be tested at the time of installation or within 10 days of being placed into service, immediately after repairs or relocation and at least annually. The Utah Cross Connection Control CommissionUtah Division of Drinking Water has adopted the field test procedures published by the Manual of Cross-Connection Control, Tenth Edition. This manual is published by the University of Southern California's Foundation for Cross-Connection Control and Hydraulic Research. Test gauges shall comply with ASSE 1064."(6)A new IPC, Section 312.10.3Section 312.11.3, is added as follows:   "312.10.3312.11.3 Tester Qualifications.  Testing shall be performed by a Utah Certified Backflow Assembly Tester in accordance with Utah Administrative Code, R309-305."

Section 16:
Section 16. Section 15A-3-304 is amended to read:15A-3-304Effective 07/01/26. Amendments to Chapter 4 of IPC.(1)In IPC, Table 403.1, the following changes are made:(a)In row number "3", for in the field for "OTHER", a new footnote h is added.(b)In row number "5", for "Adult day care and child day care" occupancy, in the field for "OTHER", a new footnote h is added.(c)Footnote f is deleted and replaced with the following: "FOOTNOTE f: The required number and type of plumbing fixtures for outdoor public swimming pools shall be in accordance with Utah Administrative Code, R392-302, Design, Construction and Operation of Public Pools."(d)A new footnote g is added as follows:  "FOOTNOTE: g:  When provided, in public toilet facilities, there shall be an equal number of diaper changing facilities in male toilet rooms and female toilet rooms. Diaper changing facilities shall meet the requirements of ASTM F2285-04 (2010) Standard Consumer Safety Performance Specifications for Diaper Changing Tables for Commercial Use."(e)A new footnote h is added to the table as follows:  "FOOTNOTE h: Non-residential child care facilities shall comply with the additional sink requirements of Utah Administrative Code, R381-60-9, Hourly Child Care Centers, R381-70-9, Out of School Time Child Care Programs, and R381-100-9, Child Care Centers."(2)In IPC, Section 403.1.1, Exception 2 is deleted and replaced with the following:"2. Where multiple-user facilities are designed to serve all genders, the following shall apply:2.1. The maximum fixture count to serve all genders shall be calculated at 50% of the total occupant load. The maximum fixture count for the multiple user all gender facility shall be calculated at 50% female and 50% male.2.2 The remaining 50% of the required restroom fixtures shall be provided as required by Table 403.1."(2)(3)In IPC, Section 405.3.4, the following sentence is added after the first sentence:  "For facilities designed for use by all genders in the same room, the partitions of the stalls shall extend from the floor to the ceiling."(3)(4)In IPC, Section 405.3.5, the following sentence is added at the end of the first paragraph:  "For facilities designed for use by all genders in the same room, the partitions of the stalls shall extend from the floor to the ceiling."(4)(5)A new IPC, Section 406.3, is added as follows:  "406.3 Automatic clothes washer safe pans.  Safe pans, when installed under automatic clothes washers, shall be installed in accordance with Section 504.7."(6)In IPC, Section 412.2, the following is added at the end of the sentence: "-2020."(5)(7)A new IPC, Section 413.5, is added as follows:  "413.5 Public toilet rooms.  All public toilet rooms shall be equipped with at least one floor drain."(6)(8)A new IPC, Section 413.6, is added as follows:  "Prohibition of motor vehicle waste disposal wells. New and existing motor vehicle waste disposal wells are prohibited. A motor vehicle waste disposal well associated with a single family residence is not subject to this prohibition."(7)(9)IPC, Section 423.3, is deleted.

Section 17:
Section 17. Section 15A-3-306 is amended to read:15A-3-306Effective 07/01/26. Amendments to Chapter 6 of IPC.(1)IPC, Section 602.3, is deleted and replaced with the following:  "602.3 Individual water supply.  Where a potable public water supply is not available, individual sources of potable water supply shall be utilized provided that the source has been developed in accordance with Utah Code, Sections 73-3-1, 73-3-3, and 73-3-25, as administered by the Department of Natural Resources, Division of Water Rights.  In addition, the quality of the water shall be approved by the local health department having jurisdiction.  The source shall supply sufficient quantity of water to comply with the requirements of this chapter."(2)IPC, Sections 602.3.1, 602.3.2, 602.3.3, 602.3.4, 602.3.5, and 602.3.5.1, are deleted.(3)In IPC, Table 604.4, the following changes are made in the column titled "MAXIMUM FLOW RATE OR QUANTITY":(a)In the row titled "Lavatory, private" the text is deleted and replaced with "1.5 gpm at 60 psi.".(b)In the row titled "Shower head" the text is deleted and replaced with "2 gpm at 80 psi.".(c)In the row titled "Urinal" the text is deleted and replaced with "0.5 gallon per flushing cycle.".(4)A new IPC, Section 604.4.1, is added as follows:  "604.4.1 Manually operated metering faucets for food service establishments.  Self closing or manually operated metering faucets shall provide a flow of water for at least 15 seconds without the need to reactivate the faucet."(5)IPC, Section 606.5, is deleted and replaced with the following:  "606.5 Water pressure booster systems.  Water pressure booster systems shall be provided as required by Section 606.5.1 through 606.5.11."(6)In IPC, Section 606.5.1, the words "public water main or" are deleted.(7)A new IPC, Section 606.5.11, is added as follows:  "606.5.11 Water pressure booster pumps connected to a public water main. A water pressure booster pump shall not be connected to a public water main unless allowed by Utah Administrative Code, Rule R309-540."(8)In IPC, Section 608.1, the words "and pollution" are added after the word "contamination."(9)In IPC, Section 608.1, the following subsections are added as follows:"608.1.1 General Installation Criteria.An assembly shall not be installed more than five feet above the floor unless a permanent platform is installed.  The assembly owner, where necessary, shall provide devices or structures to facilitate testing, repair, and maintenance and to insure the safety of the backflow technician.608.1.2 Specific Installation Criteria.608.1.2.1 Reduced Pressure Principle Backflow Prevention Assembly.A reduced pressure principle backflow prevention assembly shall be installed as follows:a. The assembly shall not be installed in a pit or below grade where the relief port could be submerged in water or where fumes could be present at the relief port discharge.b. The relief valve of the assembly shall not be directly connected to a waste disposal line, including a sanitary sewer, storm drain, or vent.c. The assembly shall be installed in a horizontal position, unless the assembly is listed or approved for vertical installation in accordance with Section 303.4.d. The bottom of each assembly shall be installed a minimum of 12 inches above the ground or the floor.e. The body of the assembly shall be a minimum of 12 inches from any wall, ceiling, or obstacle, and shall be readily accessible for testing, repair, and maintenance.608.1.2.2 Double Check Valve Backflow Prevention Assembly.A double check valve backflow prevention assembly shall be installed as follows:a. The assembly shall be installed in a horizontal position unless the assembly is listed or approved for vertical installation.b. The bottom of the assembly shall be a minimum of 12 inches above the ground or the floor.c. The body of the assembly shall be a minimum of 12 inches from any wall, ceiling, or obstacle, and shall be readily accessible for testing, repair, and maintenance.d. If installed in a pit, the assembly shall be installed with a minimum of 12 inches of clearance around all sides of the vault, including the floor and roof or ceiling, with adequate room for testing and maintenance.608.1.2.3 Pressure Vacuum Breaker Assembly and Spill Resistant Pressure Vacuum Breaker Assembly.A pressure vacuum breaker assembly and spill resistant pressure vacuum breaker assembly shall be installed as follows:a. The assembly shall not be installed in an area that could be subject to backpressure or back drainage conditions.b. The assembly shall be installed a minimum of 12 inches above all downstream piping and the highest point of use.c. The assembly shall be a minimum of 12 inches from any wall, ceiling, or obstacle, and shall be readily accessible for testing, repair, and maintenance.d. The assembly shall not be installed below ground or in a vault or pit.e. The assembly shall be installed in a vertical position."(10)In Table 608.1, under Backflow preventer plumbing devices, the following is added:     Hand-held ShowersHigh or Low HazardBackpressure or BacksiphonageASME 112.18.3 or ASSE 1014(10)(11)In IPC, Section 608.3, the word "and" before the word "contamination" is deleted and replaced with a comma and the words " or pollution" are added after the word "contamination" in the first sentence.(11)(12)In IPC, Section 608.6, the words "with the potential to create a condition of either contamination or pollution or" are added after the word "substances."(12)(13)In IPC, Section 608.7, the following sentence is added at the end of the paragraph: "Any connection between potable water piping and sewer-connected waste shall be protected by an air gap in accordance with Section 608.14.1."(13)(14)IPC, Section 608.8, is deleted and replaced with the following:  " 608.8 Stop and Waste Valves"608.8 Stop-and-waste valves installed below grade.  Combination stop-and-waste valves shall be permitted to be installed underground or below grade.  Freeze proof yard hydrants that drain the riser into the ground are considered to be stop-and-waste valves and shall be permitted. A stop-and-waste valve shall be installed in accordance with a manufacturer's recommended installation instructions."(14)(15)IPC, Section 608.14.3, is deleted and replaced with the following: " "608.14.3 Backflow preventer with intermediate atmospheric vent.  Backflow preventers with intermediate atmospheric vents shall conform to ASSE 1012 or CSA CAN/CSA-B64.3.  These devices shall be permitted to be installed on residential boilers, without chemical treatment, where subject to continuous pressure conditions, and humidifiers in accordance with Section 608.17.10.  The relief opening shall discharge by air gap and shall be prevented from being submerged."(15)(16)IPC, Section 608.14.4, is deleted.(16)(17)IPC, Section 608.16.3, is deleted and replaced with the following:  " "608.16.3 Protection by a backflow preventer with intermediate atmospheric vent.  Connections to residential boilers only, without chemical treatment, and humidifiers shall be protected by a backflow preventer with an intermediate atmospheric vent."(17)(18)IPC, Section 608.16.4, is deleted and replaced with the following:  " "608.16.4 Protection by a vacuum breaker.  Openings and outlets shall be protected by atmospheric-type or pressure-type vacuum breakers.  Vacuum breakers shall not be installed under exhaust hoods or similar locations that will contain toxic fumes or vapors.  Fill valves shall be set in accordance with Section 415.3.1.  Atmospheric Vacuum Breakers - The critical level of the atmospheric vacuum breaker shall be set a minimum of 6six inches (152 mm) above the flood level rim of the fixture or device.  Pipe-applied vacuum breakers shall be installed at the highest point, but not less than 6six inches (152 mm) above the flood level rim of the fixture, receptor, or device served.  No valves shall be installed downstream of the atmospheric vacuum breaker. The atmospheric vacuum breaker shall not be installed where it may be subjected to continuous pressure for more than 12 consecutive hours at any time. Pressure Vacuum Breaker - The critical level of the pressure vacuum breaker shall be set a minimum of 12 inches (304 mm) above the flood level of the fixture device and above all downstream piping and the highest point of use."(18)(19)In IPC, Section 608.16.4.2, the following is added after the first sentence:  "Add-on-backflow prevention devices shall be non-removable.  In climates where freezing temperatures occur, a listed self-draining frost proof hose bibb with an integral backflow preventer shall be used."(19)(20)In IPC, Section 608.17.1.2, the words "or ASSE 1024" are deleted.(20)(21)IPC, Section 608.17.2, is deleted and replaced as follows:  " "608.17.2 Connections to boilers.  The potable supply to a boiler shall be protected by an air gap or a reduced pressure principle backflow preventer, complying with ASSE 1013, CSA B64.4 or AWWA C511.Exception: The potable supply to a residential boiler without chemical treatment may be equipped with a backflow preventer with an intermediate atmospheric vent complying with ASSE 1012, ASSE 1081.1, or CSA CAN/CSA-B64.3."(21)(22)In IPC, Section 608.17.4.1, a new exception is added as follows:  "Exception: All class 1 and 2 systems containing chemical additives consisting of strictly glycerine (C.P. or U.S.P. 96.5 percent grade) or propylene glycol shall be protected against backflow with a double check valve assembly or double check valve detector assembly.  Such systems shall include written certification of the chemical additives at the time of original installation and service or maintenance."(22)(23)IPC, Section 608.17.7, is deleted and replaced with the following:  " "608.17.7 Chemical dispensers.  Where chemical dispensers connect to the water distribution system, the water supply system shall be protected against backflow in accordance with Section 608.14.1, Section 608.14.2, Section 608.14.5, Section 608.14.6 or Section  608.14.8. Installation shall be in accordance with Section 608.1.2. Chemical dispensers shall connect to a separate dedicated water supply line, and not downstream of an atmospheric vacuum breaker."(23)(24)IPC, Section 608.17.8, is deleted and replaced with the following:  " "608.17.8 Portable cleaning equipment.  Where the portable cleaning equipment connects to the water distribution system, the water supply system shall be protected against backflow in accordance with Section 608.14.1 or Section 608.14.2."(24)(25)A new IPC, Section 608.17.11, is added as follows:  " "608.17.11 Automatic and coin operated car washes.  The water supply to an automatic or coin operated car wash shall be protected in accordance with Section 608.14.2."(25)(26)IPC, Section 608.18, is deleted and replaced with the following:  " "608.18 Protection of individual water supplies.  See Section 602.3 for requirements."

Section 18:
Section 18. Section 15A-3-313 is amended to read:15A-3-313Effective 07/01/26. Amendments to Chapter 13 of IPC.(1)A new IPC, Section 1301.4.1, is added as follows:"1301.4.1 Recording.The existence of a nonpotable water system shall be recorded on the deed of ownership for the property.  The certificate of occupancy shall not be issued until the documentation for the recording required under this section is completed by the property owner."(2)IPC, Section 1301.5, is deleted and replaced with the following:"1301.5 Potable water connections.Where a potable water system is connected to a nonpotable water system, the potable water supply shall be protected against backflow by a reduced pressure backflow prevention assembly or an air gap installed in accordance with Section 608."(3)In IPC, a new Section 1301.5.1 is added as follows:  "1301.5.1 Potable water connections.  A system that utilizes nonpotable water (i.e., pressurized irrigation) and installs a connection to the potable water system for backup mustshall install a Reduced Pressure Principle Assembly (RP) directly downstream of the potable water connection (Stop and Waste) and install a dual source connection directly downstream from the (RP) installed so that either the potable water system or the nonpotable water is connected at any time to prevent a direct Cross Connection and to protect the potable water from any potential hazard from the nonpotable water system. See Utah Code Section 19-4-112. Note: RP mustshall be tested within 10 days of installation and annually whether the drinking water is used or not."(4)IPC, Section 1301.9.4, is deleted and replaced with the following:" 1301.9.4 Makeup water.Where an uninterrupted supply is required for the intended application, potable or reclaimed water shall be provided as a source of makeup water for the storage tank.  The makeup water supply shall be protected against backflow by a reduced pressure backflow prevention assembly or an air gap installed in accordance with Section 608.  A full-open valve located on the makeup water supply line to the storage tank shall be provided.  Inlets to the storage tank shall be controlled by fill valves or other automatic supply valves installed to prevent the tank from overflowing and to prevent the water level from dropping below a predetermined point.  Where makeup water is provided, the water level shall not be permitted to drop below the source water inlet or the intake of any attached pump."(5)IPC, Section 1302.12.4, is deleted and replaced with the following:"1302.12.4 Inspection and testing of backflow prevention assemblies.Testing of a backflow preventer shall be conducted in accordance with Sections 312.10.1, 312.10.2, and 312.10.3Sections 312.11.1 and 312.11.2."(6)IPC, Section 1303.15.6, is deleted and replaced with the following:"1303.15.6 Inspection and testing of backflow prevention assemblies.Testing of a backflow prevention assembly shall be conducted in accordance with Sections 312.10.1, 312.10.2,  and 312.10.3Sections 312.11.1, 312.11.2, and 312.11.3."(7)IPC, Section 1304.4.2, is deleted and replaced with the following:"1304.4.2 Inspection and testing of backflow prevention assemblies.Testing of a backflow preventer or backwater valve shall be conducted in accordance with Sections 312.10.1, 312.10.2, and 312.10.3Sections 312.11.1, 312.11.2, and 312.11.3."

Section 19:
Section 19. Section 15A-3-315 is amended to read:15A-3-315Effective 07/01/26. Amendments to Chapter 15 of IPC.(1)In IPC, Chapter 15, the following reference standards are deleted: ASSE 5013-2015, ASSE 5015-2015, ASSE 5020-2015, ASSE 5047-2015, ASSE 5048-2015, ASSE 5052-98, ASSE 5056-2015, CSA B64.10-17, and CSA B64.10.1-17.(2)In IPC, Chapter 15, the following referenced standard is added:    "Standard reference numberTitleReferenced in code section numberUSC-FCCCHR 10th Edition Manual of Cross Connection ControlFoundation for Cross-Connection Control and Hydraulic Research University of Southern California Kaprielian Hall 300 Los Angeles CA 90089-2531Section 312.10.2312.11.2"

Section 20:
Section 20. Section 15A-3-401 is amended to read:15A-3-401Effective 07/01/26. General provisions.(1)The amendments in this part are adopted as amendments to the IMC to be applicable statewide.(2)In IMC, Section 505.4, a new subsection 505.4.1 is added as follows:  "505.4.1 Makeup Air.  Makeup air is not required in residential dwelling units where gas, liquid, or solid fuel-burning appliances located within a units air barrier are all direct-vent or use a mechanical draft venting system."(3)In IMC, Section 1004.2, the first sentence is deleted and replaced with the following:  " In accordance with Title 34A, Chapter 7, Safety, and requirements made by rule by the Labor Commission, boilers and pressure vessels in Utah are regulated by the Utah Labor Commission, Division of Boiler, Elevator and Coal Mine Safety, except those located in private residences or in apartment houses of less than five family units.  Boilers shall be installed in accordance with their listing and labeling, with minimum clearances as prescribed by the manufacturer's installation instructions and the state boiler code, whichever is greater."(4)In IMC, Section 1004.3.1, the word "unlisted" is inserted before the word "boilers.".(5)In IMC, Section 1109.2.5, Exception 2, the words "using Group A1 refrigerant" are deleted.(5)(6)In IMC, Section 1209.3, the following words are added at the end of the section:  "or other methods approved for the application."

Section 21:
Section 21. Section 15A-3-402 is amended to read:15A-3-402Effective 07/01/26. Amendments to Chapters 1 through 5 of IMC.(1)In IMC, Table 403.3.1.1, note "h" is deleted and replaced with the following:"h. 1. A nail salon shall provide each manicure station where a nail technician files or shapes an acrylic nail, as defined by rule by the Division of Professional Licensing, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, with:a. a source capture system equipped with, at minimum, a MERV 8 particulate filter and an activated carbon filter that is capable of filtering and recirculating air to inside space at a rate not less than 50 cfm per station; orb. a source capture system capable of exhausting not less than 50 cfm per station.c.  A nail salon that complies with Note h. la or h. lb is not required to comply with the labeling, listing, or testing requirements described in International Mechanical Code sections 301.7 or 301.8.2. For a source capture system described in paragraph 1, the source capture system inlets for exhausting or recirculating air shall be located in accordance with Section 502.20.3. Where one or more exhausting source capture systems described in paragraph 1 operate continuously during occupancy, the source capture system exhaust rate shall be permitted to be applied to the exhaust flow rate required by Table 403.3.1.1 for the nail salon.4. The requirements of this note apply to:a. an existing nail salon that remodels the nail salon after July 1, 2017;b. a new nail salon that begins construction after July 1, 2017; andc. all nail salons beginning on July 1, 2020."(2) IMC, Section 502.20 is deleted and rewritten as follows:"502.20 Manicure stations. A nail salon that files or shapes an acrylic nail shall provide each manicure station with a source capture system in accordance with Table 403.3.1.1, note h. For a manicure table that does not have factory-installed source capture system inlets for recirculating or exhausting air, a nail salon shall provide the manicure table with inlets for recirculating or exhausting air located not more than 12 inches (305 mm) horizontally and vertically from the point of any acrylic chemical application.Exception: Section 502.20 applies to a manicure station in:a. an existing nail salon that remodels the nail salon after July 1, 2017;b. a new nail salon that begins construction after July 1, 2017; andc. all nail salons beginning on July 1, 2020."(3)In IMC, Section 908.1, the following words are added at the end of the last sentence: "or UL/CSA 60335-2-40."(4)In IMC, Section 918.1, the following words are added after "1995": "or UL/CSA 60335-2-40."(5)In IMC, Section 918.2, the following words are added at the end of the sentence: "or UL/CSA 60335-2-40."(6)In IMC, Section 1101.6, the following sentence is added at the end of the paragraph: "High probability systems utilizing A2L refrigerants shall comply with ASHRAE 15."(7) IMC, Chapter 15 is amended by adding the following referenced standard to CSA:    "Standard reference numberTitleReferenced in code section numberCSA: CSA C22.2 60335-2-40-2019Standard for Household and Similar Electrical Appliances, Part 2-40: Particular Requirements for Electrical Heat Pumps, Air-Conditioners and Dehumidifiers - 3rd EditionM1403.1, M1412.1, M1413.1"(8)In IMC, Section 1109.2.5, the words using "Group A1 refrigerant" are deleted in Exception 2. (9)IMC, Chapter 15 is amended by adding the following referenced standard to UL:    "Standard reference numberTitleReferenced in code section numberUL: 60335-2-40-2019Standard for Household and Similar Electrical Appliances, Part 2-40: Particular Requirements for Electrical Heat Pumps, Air-Conditioners and Dehumidifiers - 3rd EditionM1403.1, M1412.1, M1413.1"

Section 22:
Section 22. Section 15A-3-501 is amended to read:15A-3-501Effective 07/01/26. General provisions.The following are adopted as an amendment to the IFGC to be applicable statewide:(1)In IFGC, Section 404.9, a new Section 404.9.1, is added as follows:  "404.9.1 Meter protection.  Fuel gas services shall be in an approved location and/or provided with structures designed to protect the fuel gas meter and surrounding piping from physical damage, including falling, moving, or migrating ice and snow.  If an added structure is used, it mustshall still provide access for service and comply with the IBC or the IRC."(2)IFGC, Section 409.5.3, is deleted.(3)In IFGC, Section 502.1, the last sentence is deleted and replaced with "Plastic vents for Category IV appliances shall not be required to be listed and labeled where such vents comply with all of the following:1. specified by the appliance manufacturer;2. installed in accordance with the appliance manufacturer's instructions; and3. the vent gas temperatures do not exceed 140 degrees Fahrenheit."(4)In IFGC, Section 503.4.1, in the last sentence after "appliance manufacturer" insert: "where the appliance vent gas temperatures do not exceed 140 degrees Fahrenheit,".(5)(3)In IFGC, Section 503.6.11.1, the following exception is added:"Exception: Existing and replacement Category I appliances may be located in rooms within the occupiable space provided all the following are met:1. The original installation was compliant with existing codes at the time of installation.2. The dwelling is equipped with a current, operable carbon monoxide detector, installed in accordance with Section 915 of the International Building Code.3. The AHJ has approved a replacement based on the extreme difficulty of an installing individual Category I vent system or a direct vent Category IV appliance.4. The room or space is used for no other purpose.5. Combustion air is provided in accordance with Section 304. Where outdoor combustion air is provided, the room has a solid weather-stripped door equipped with an approved self-closure device.6. Common vents terminate with a listed cap."(6)(4)In IFGC, Section 631.2, the following sentence is inserted before the first sentence:  " In accordance with Title 34A, Chapter 7, Safety, and requirements made by rule by the Labor Commission, boilers and pressure vessels in Utah are regulated by the Utah Labor Commission, Division of Boiler, Elevator and Coal Mine Safety, except those located in private residences or in apartment houses of less than five family units. Boilers shall be installed in accordance with their listing and labeling, with minimum clearances as prescribed by the manufacturer's installation instructions and the state boiler code, whichever is greater."

Section 23:
Section 23. Section 15A-3-701 is amended to read:15A-3-701Effective 07/01/26. General provisions.The following is adopted as an amendment to the IECC to be applicable statewide:(1)IECC, Section C405.11, is deleted and replaced with the following: "C405.11 Automatic receptacle control. Automatic receptacle control to be optional and decided by property owner."(2)(1)In IECC, Section R102.1.1, a new section R102.1.1 is added as follows:  "R102.1.1 National Green Building Standard complying with ICC 700-2020  National Green Building Standard and achieving the Gold rating level for the energy efficiency category shall be deemed to exceed the energy efficiency required by this code. The building shall also meet the requirements identified in table N1105.2 and the building thermal envelope efficiency is greater than or equal to levels of efficiency and solar heat gain coefficients (SHGC) in Tables N1102.2.2 and N1102.1.3 of  the 2009 IRC."(3)(2)In IECC, Section R103.2, all words after the words "herein governed.," are deleted and replaced with the following:  "Construction documents include all documentation required for building permits shall include only those items specified in Section 10-5-132(8) of the Utah Municipal Code."(4)(3)In IECC, Section R303.1.3, the following changes are made:(a)The following is added at the end of the first sentence: "or EN 14351-1:2006+A1:2010."(b)The word "accredited" is replaced with "approved" in the third sentence.(c)The following sentence is added after the third sentence:  "A conversion factor of 5.678 shall be used to convert from U values expressed in SI units: ()/53678=."(d)After "NFRC 200" the following words are added: "or EN 14351-1:2006+A1:2010", and in the sentence the word "accredited" is replaced with the word "approved.".(e)The following new sentence shall be inserted immediately prior tobefore the last sentence:  "Total Energy Transmittance values may be substituted for SHGC, and Luminous Transmission values may be substituted for VT."(5)(4)In IECC, Section R303.3, all wording after the first sentence is deleted.(6)(5)In IECC, Section R401.2, in the first sentence, the words "Section R401.13.5 and" are deleted.(7)(6)In IECC, Section R401.2.5 is deleted.(8)(7)In IECC, Section R401.3 Number 7, the words "and the compliance path used" are deleted.(9)(8)In IECC Table R402.1.2, the following changes are made:(a)in the column titled "Fenestration U-Factor", the following changes are made:(i)in the row titled "Climate Zone 3", delete 0.30 and replace it with 0.32;(ii)in the row titled "Climate Zone 5 and Marine 4", delete 0.30 and replace it with 0.32; and(iii)in the row titled "Climate Zone 6", delete 0.30 and replace it with 0.32;(b)in the column titled "Glazed Fenestration SHGC", the following change is made: in the row titled "Climate Zone 3" delete 0.25 and replace it with 0.35;(c)in the column titled "Climate U-Factor", the following changes are made:(i)in the row titled "Climate Zone 3", delete 0.026 and replace it with 0.030;(ii)in the row titled "Climate Zone 5 and Marine 4", delete 0.024 and replace it with 0.026; and(iii)in the row titled "Climate Zone 6", delete 0.024 and replace it with 0.026;(d)in the column titled "Wood Frame Wall U Factor", the following changes are made:(i)in the row titled "Climate Zone 3", delete 0.060 and replace it with 0.060;(ii)in the row titled "Climate Zone 5 and Marine 4", delete 0.045 and replace it with 0.060; and(iii)in the row titled "Climate Zone 6", delete 0.045 and replace it with 0.060;(e)in the column titled "Basement wall U-Factor", the following changes are made:(i)in the row titled "Climate Zone 5 and Marine 4", delete 0.050 and replace it with 0.075; and(ii)in the row titled  "Climate Zone 6", delete 0.50 and replace it with 0.065; and(f)in the column titled "Crawl Space Wall U-Factor", the following changes are made:(i)in the row titled "Climate Zone 5 and Marine 4", delete 0.055 and replace it with 0.078; and(ii)in the row titled  "Climate Zone 6", delete 0.55 and replace it with 0.065.(10)(9)In IECC, Table R402.1.3, the following changes are made:(a)in the column titled "Fenestration U-Factor", the following changes are made:(i)in the row titled "Climate Zone 3", delete 0.30 and replace it with 0.32;(ii)in the row titled "Climate Zone 5 and Marine 4", delete 0.30 and replace it with 0.32; and(iii)in the row titled "Climate Zone 6", delete 0.30 and replace it with 0.32;(b)in the column titled "Glazed Fenestration SHGC", the following change is made: in the row titled "Climate Zone 3" delete 0.25 and replace it with 0.35;(c)in the column R-Value the following changes are made:(i)in the row titled "Climate Zone 3", delete 49 and replace it with 38;(ii)in the row titled "Climate Zone 5 and Marine 4", delete 60 and replace it with 49; and(iii)in the row titled "Climate Zone 6", delete 60 and replace it with 49;(d)in the column titled "Wood Frame Wall R-Value", the following changes are made:(i)in the row titled "Climate Zone 3", delete all values and replace with "20+Oci or 13+5ci or 0+15ci";(ii)in the row titled "Climate Zone 5 or Marine 4", delete all values and replace with "21+Oci or 15+5ci or 0+15ci"; and(iii)in the row titled "Climate Zone 6", delete all values and replace with "21+Oci or 15+5ci or 0+15ci";(e)in the column titled "Basement Wall R-Value", the following changes are made:(i)in the row titled "Climate Zone 5 or Marine 4", delete all values and replace with "15+Oci or 0+11ci or 11+5ci"; and(ii)in the row titled  "Climate Zone 6", delete all values and replace with "19+Oci or 0+13ci or 11+5ci";(f)in the column titled "Slab R-Value and Depth", the following changes are made:(i)in the row titled "Climate Zone 3", delete "10ci. 2ft" and replace it with "NR"; and(ii)in the row titled "Climate Zone 5  ;and Marine 4", delete "4 ft" and replace it with "2 ft";(g)in the column titled "Crawl Space Wall R-Value", the following changes are made:(i)in the row titled "Climate Zone 5 or Marine 4", delete all values and replace with "15+Oci or 0+11ci  or 11+5ci"; and(ii)in the row titled  "Climate Zone 6", delete all values and replace with "19+Oci or 0+13ci or 0+11+5ci"; and(h)in IECC, Table R402.2, in the column titled "MASS WALL R-VALUE", a new footnote "j" is added as follows:  "j  Log walls complying with ICC400 and with a minimum average wall thickness of 5five inches or greater shall be permitted in "Zones 5 through 8" when overall window glazing has a .31 U-factor or lower, minimum heating equipment efficiency is 90 AFUE (gas) or 84 AFUE (oil), and all other component requirements are met."(11)(10)In IECC, a new subsection R402.1.5.1 is added as follows:   "R402.1.5.1 RESCheck 2012 Utah Energy Conservation Code. Compliance with section N1102.1.5 (R402.1.5) may be satisfied using the software RESCheck 2012 Utah Energy Conservation Code, which shall satisfy the R-value and U-factor requirements of N1102.1, N1102.2, and N1102.3, provided the following conditions are met:(a)In Climate Zone 5 and 6 the software result shall show 5% better than code; and(b)In Climate Zone 3, the software result shall show 5% better than code when software inputs for window U-factor = 0.65 and window SHGC = 0.40, notwithstanding actual windows installed shall conform to requirements of Tables N1102.1.2 (R402.1.2) and N1102.1.3 (R402.1.3)."(12)(11)In IECC, Section R402.2.1, a new section is added as follows:  "R402.2.1.1. Unvented attic and unvented enclosed rafter assemblies. Unvented attic and unvented enclosed rafter assemblies conforming to Section R806.5 shall be provided with an R-value of R-22 (maximum U-Factor of 0.045) in Climate Zone 3-B or an R-value of R-26 (maximum U-factor of 0.038) in Climate Zones 5-B and 6-B shall be permitted provided all the following conditions are met:1. The unvented attic assembly complies with the requirements of the International Residential Code, Section R806.5.2. The house shall attain a blower door test result  2.5ACH 50.3. The house shall require a whole house mechanical ventilation system that does not rely solely on a negative pressure strategy (mustshall be positive, balanced or hybrid).4. Where insulation is installed below the roof deck and the exposed portion of roof rafters are not already covered by the R-20 depth of the air-impermeable insulation, the exposed portion of the roof rafters shall be wrapped (covered) by minimum R-3 unless directly covered by drywall/finished ceiling. Roof rafters are not required to be covered by minimum R-3 if a continuous insulation is installed above the roof deck.5. Indoor heating, cooling and ventilation equipment (including ductwork) shall be inside the building thermal envelope."(13)(12)A new IECC, Section R402.2.1.3 is added as follows:  "R402.2.1.3 Walls with Air-Impermeable Insulation. Where IECC Table R402.1.2 requires R-20 for wood framed walls in climate zones 3-B and 5-B or R-20+5CI for climate zone 6-B, an air-impermeable insulation installed in the wall cavity with R-value of R-15 for climate zones 3-B and 5-B or R-20 for climate zone 6-B shall be deemed equivalent to the provisions in IECC Table R402.1.2, provided the home attains a blower door test  2.5ACH."(14)(13)In IECC, Section R402.2.9.1, the numeral "(i)" is added before the words "cut at a 45 degree" and the following is added after the words "exterior wall:": "or (ii) lowered from top of slab 4" when a 4" thermal break material such as, but not limited to, felt or asphalt impregnated fiber board, with a minimum thickness of 1/4" is installed at the upper 4" of slab."(15)(14)In IECC, Section R402.4.1, in the first sentence, the word "and" is deleted and replaced with the word "or.".(16)(15)In IECC, Section R402.4.1.1, the second and the last sentences are deleted and replaced with the following:  "Where required by the code official, the builder shall certify compliance with criteria indicated in Table R1102.4.1 for items which are not readily visible during regularly scheduled inspections."(17)(16)In IECC, Table R402.4.1.1 in the column titled "COMPONENT",  the following changes are made:(a)in the row "Rim Joists" the word "exterior" in the first sentence is deleted, and the second sentence is deleted.(b)In the row "Electrical/phone box on the exterior walls" the last sentence is deleted and replaced with: "Alternatively, close cell foam, caulking or gaskets may be used, or air sealed boxes may be installed."(18)(17)In IECC, Section R402.4.1.2, the following changes are made:(a)In the fourth sentence, the word "third" is deleted.(b)The following sentence is added after the fourth sentence: "The following parties shall be approved to conduct testing: Parties certified by BPI or RESNET, or licensed contractors who have completed training provided by Blower Door Test equipment manufacturers or other comparable training."(c)In the first Exception the second sentence is deleted.(19)(18)In IECC, Section R402.4.1.3, the following changes are made:(a)in the first sentence, the words 5.0 air changes per hour in Climate Zones 0, 1 and 2, and 3.0 are deleted and replaced with 4.0., and the words in Climate Zone 3 through 8 are deleted;(b)in the first sentence of the Exception, 0.28 is replaced with 5.0 air changes per hour or 0.30; and(c)in Number 2, the words of "conditioned floor area" are inserted before the words "or smaller."(20)(19)In IECC, Section R402.6 is deleted.(21)(20)In IECC, Section R403.3.1 is deleted and replaced with the following:  "Ducts located outside conditioned space. Supply and return ducts in attics shall be insulated to a minimum of R-8 where 3three inches (76.2 mm) in diameter and greater and R-6 where less than 3three inches (76.2 mm) in diameter. Supply and return ducts in other portions of the building shall be insulated to a minimum of R-6 where 3three inches (76.2 mm) in diameter or greater and R-4.2 where less than 3three inches (76.2 mm) in diameter. Exception: Ducts or portions thereof located completely inside the building thermal envelope."(22)(21)In IECC, Section R403.3.3, is deleted.(23)(22)In IECC, Section R403.3.3.1 is deleted.(24)(23)In IECC, Section R403.3.5, the following changes are made:(a)a second Exception is added as follows:  "A duct leakage test shall not be required for any system designed such that no air handlers or ducts are located within unconditioned attics."(b)the following is added at the end of the section:  "The following parties shall be approved to conduct testing:(i)Parties certified by BPT or RESNET(ii)Licensed contractors who have completed training provided by Duct Test equipment manufacturers or other comparable training."(25)(24)In IECC, Section N1103.3.6 (R403.3.6) the following changes are made:(a)in Subsection 1:(i)the number 4.0 is changed to 6.0;(ii)the number 113.3 is changed to 170;(iii)the number 3.0 is changed to 5.0; and(iv)the number 85 is changed to 141;(b)in Subsection 2:(i)the number 4.0 is changed to 5.0; and(ii)the number 113.3 is changed to 141; and(c)Subsection 3 is deleted.(26)(25)In IECC, Section N1103.3.7 (R403.3.7) the words "or plenums" are deleted.(27)(26)In IECC, Section N1103.5.1.1 (R403.5.1.1) the words "Where installed" are added at the beginning of the first sentence.(28)(27)IECC, Section R403.6.2, is deleted and replaced with the following:  "R403.6.2 Whole-house mechanical ventilation system fan efficacy. Fans used to provide whole-house mechanical ventilation shall meet the efficacy requirements of Table R403.6.2.""Exception: Where an air handler that is integral to tested and listed HVAC equipment is used to provide whole-house mechanical ventilation, the air handler shall be powered by an electronically commutated motor."(29)(28)In IECC, Section R403.6.2, the table is deleted and replaced with the following:"TABLE R403.6.2""MECHANICAL VENTILATION SYSTEM FAN EFFICACY"                                   FAN LOCATIONAIR FLOW RATE MINIMUM (CFM)MINIMUM EFFICACY (CFM/WATT)AIR FLOW RATE MAXIMUM (CFM)HRV or ERVAny1.2 cfm/wattAnyRange hoodsAny2.8 cfm/wattAnyIn-line fanAny2.8 cfm/wattAnyBathroom, utility room101.4 cfm/watt90Bathroom, utility room902.8 cfm/wattAny"(30)(29)In IECC, Section R403.6.3 is deleted.(31)(30)In IECC, Section R403.7, the word "approved" is deleted in the first sentence and the following is added after the word "methodologies": "complying with R403.7.1."(32)(31)A new IECC, Section R403.7.1, is added as follows:  "R403.7.1 Qualifications. An individual performing load calculations shall be qualified by completing HVAC training from one of the following:1. HVAC load calculation education from ACCA;2. A recognized educational institution;3. HVAC equipment manufacturer's training; or4. Other recognized industry certification."(33)(32)In IECC, Section R404.1, the word "All" is replaced with "Not less than 90 percent of  the lamps in."(34)(33)In IECC, Section R404.1.1 is deleted.(35)(34)In IECC, Section R404.2 is deleted.(36)(35)In IECC, Section R404.3 is deleted.(37)(36)In IECC, Section R405.2 the following changes are made:(a)in Subsection 3, the words "approved by the code official" are deleted; and(b)in Subsection 3, the following words are added at the end of the sentence: "when applicable and readily available."(38)(37)In IECC, Section R406.3 "Building thermal envelope" is deleted, and replaced with the following:  "Building thermal envelope and on-site renewables. The proposed total building thermal envelope UA, which is the sum of U-factor times assembly area, shall be less than or equal to the building thermal envelope UA using the prescriptive U-factors From Table N1102.1.2 multiplied by 1.15 in accordance with Equation 11-4. The area-weighted maximum fenestration SHGC permitted in Climate Zones 0 through 3 shall be 0.30.UAProposed design = 1.15 x UAPrescriptive reference design (Equation 11-4)."(39)(38) In IECC, Section R406.3.1 is deleted.(40)(39)In IECC, Section R406.3.2 is deleted.(41)(40)In IECC, Section R406.4 the following changes are made:(a)in the first sentence, the words "in accordance with Equation 11-5" are deleted and replaced with: "permitted to be calculated using the minimum total air exchange Rate for the rated home (Qtot) and for the index adjustment factor in accordance with Equation 11.5.";(b)in equation 11-5, the words "Ventilation rate, CFM" are deleted and replaced with: "Qtot"; and(c)in the last sentence, the number "5" is deleted and replaced with "15.".(42)(41)In IECC, Section R406.5 in the column titled ENERGY RATING INDEX of Table R406.5, the following changes are made:(a)in the row for Climate Zone 3, "51" is deleted and replaced with "65";(b)in the row for Climate Zone 5, "55" is deleted and replaced with "69"; and(c)in the row for Climate Zone 6, "54" is deleted and replaced with "68.".(43)(42)In IECC, Section R408 is deleted.(a)(i)(A)In IECC, Chapter 6, the standard for ANSI/RESNET/ICC 201-2019 section 4.4.4 is added as follows:  "4.4.4. Air Source Heat Pumps and Air Conditioners. For Heat Pumps and Air Conditioners with the more recent Manufacturers Equipment Performance Ratings (HSPF2 or SEER2) available, and HSPF and SEER are not available, these ratings shall be converted to HSPF and SEER values by dividing HSPF2 or SEER2 by the conversion factors in Table 4.4.4.1(1).  If the type of equipment is not determined, the conversion shall default to the Ducted Split System factors.  All calculations, including Equation 4.1-1a shall use HSPF or SEER values as made available by the Manufacturer or converted as specified in this section. Table 4.4.4.1(1) SEER2 and HSPF2 Conversion"     Equipment TypeSEER2/SEEREER2/EER4HSPF2/HSPFDuctless Systems1.001.000.90Ducted Split System0.950.950.85Ducted Packaged System0.950.950.84Small Duct High Velocity System1.00Not Applicable0.85Ducted Space-Constrained Air Conditioner0.97Not ApplicableNot ApplicableDucted Space-Constrained Heat Pump0.99Not Applicable0.85"

Section 24:
Section 24. Section 15A-3-801 is amended to read:15A-3-801Effective 07/01/26. General provisions.The following are adopted as amendments to the IEBC and are applicable statewide:(1)In IEBC, Section 202, the definition for "Approved" is modified by adding the words "or independent third-party licensed engineer or architect and submitted to the building official" after the word official. (2)In IEBC, Section 202, the following definition is added:  "BUILDING OFFICIAL.  See Code official."(3)In IEBC, Section 202, the definition for "Code officialCODE OFFICIAL" is deleted and replaced with the following:"CODE OFFICIAL.  The officer or other designated authority having jurisdiction (AHJ) charged with the administration and enforcement of this code."(4)In IEBC, Section 202, the definition for "Existing buildingsEXISTING BUILDINGS" is deleted and replaced with the following:"EXISTING BUILDING.  A building that is not a dangerous building and that was either lawfully erected under a prior adopted code, or deemed a legal non-conforming building by the code official."(5)In IEBC, Section 302.3, the following is added after the words "code official" in the last sentence:  "or independent third-party licensed engineer or architect and submitted to the building official."(6)In IEBC, Section 301.3, the exception is deleted.(7)In IEBC, Section 503.5, the following is added after the words "BSE-1E earthquake hazard level" in the last sentence:"and using an objective of Life Safety Nonstructural Performance with the BSE-2E earthquake hazard level."(7)(8)IEBC, Section 503.6 is deleted and replaced with the following:"503.6 Bracing for unreinforced masonry parapets and other appendages upon reroofing.Where the intended alteration requires a permit for reroofing and involves removal of roofing materials from more than 25% of the roof area of a building assigned to Seismic Design Category D, E, or F that has parapets constructed of unreinforced masonry or appendages such as cornices, spires, towers, tanks, signs, statuary, etc., the work shall include installation of bracing to resist out-of-plane seismic forces, unless an evaluation demonstrates compliance of such items. Reduced seismic forces are permitted for design purposescriteria of IEBC, Section 304.3.2 is permitted."(9)In IEBC, Section 503.11, the following is added after the words "BSE-1E earthquake hazard level" in the last sentence:"and using an objective of Life Safety Nonstructural Performance with the BSE-2E earthquake hazard level."(10)In IEBC, Section 705.2, a new Exception 2 is added as follows:"(2) Where permitted by the roof covering manufacturer, any existing layers of polyisocyanurate insulation, expanded polystyrene (EPS), or extruded polystyrene (XPS), shall be permitted to remain in place if the  roof deck is evaluated, is in serviceable condition, and the insulation is not damaged, deteriorated or water soaked. All other types of roof insulation and any areas of damage, deteriorated or water soaked insulation shall be removed and replaced with new insulation."(8)(11)IEBC, Section 706.3.1 is deleted and replaced with the following:"706.3.1 Bracing for unreinforced masonry bearing wall parapets and other appendages.Where a permit is issued for reroofing more than 25 percent of the roof area of a building assigned to Seismic Design Category D, E, or F that has parapets constructed of unreinforced masonry or appendages such as cornices, spires, towers, tanks, signs, statuary, etc., the work shall include installation of bracing to resist the reduced International Building Code level seismic forces as specified in Section 303Section 304.3.2 of this code unless an evaluation demonstrates compliance of such items."(12)In IEBC, Section 906.2, the following is added after the words "BSE-1E earthquake hazard level" in the last sentence:"and using an objective of Life Safety Nonstructural Performance with the BSE-2E earthquake hazard level."(13)In IEBC, Section 906.3, the following is added after the words "BSE-1E earthquake hazard level" in the last sentence:"and using an objective of Life Safety Nonstructural Performance with the BSE-2E earthquake hazard level."(9)(14)IEBC, Section 906.6 is deleted and replaced with the following:"906.6 Bracing for unreinforced masonry parapets and other appendages upon reroofing.Where the intended alteration requires a permit for reroofing and involves removal of roofing materials from more than 25% of the roof area of a building assigned to Seismic Design Category D, E, or F that has parapets constructed of unreinforced masonry or appendages such as cornices, spires, towers, tanks, signs, statuary, etc., the work shall include installation of bracing to resist out-of-plane seismic forces, unless an evaluation demonstrates compliance with such items. Reduced seismic forces are permitted for design purposescriteria of IEBC, Section 304.3.2, is permitted."(10)(15)(a)Section 1006.3 is deleted and replaced with the following:"1006.3 Seismic loads. Where a change of occupancy results in a building being assigned to a higher risk category, or when a change of occupancy results in a design occupant load increase of 100% or more, the building shall satisfy the requirements of Section 1613 of the International Building Code using full seismic forces."In IEBC, Section 1006.3, Seismic Loads, the following is added after the words "higher risk category" in the first sentence: "or when a change of occupancy results in a design occupant load increase of 100% or more."(b)In IEBC, Section 1006.3, exceptionsExceptions 1 through 4 remain unchanged.(c)In IEBC, Section 1006.3, add a new exceptionException 5 as follows:"5. Where the design occupant load increase is less than 25 occupants and the occupancy category does not change."(11)(16)In IEBC, Section 1011.7.3, exceptionException 2 is deleted.

Section 25:
Section 25. Section 15A-3-1001 is amended to read:15A-3-1001Effective 07/01/26. General provisions.(1)In ISPSC, Section 202, the following definition is added for private residential swimming pool:  "PRIVATE RESIDENTIAL SWIMMING POOL (Residential Pool). A swimming pool, spa pool, or wading pool used only by an individual, family, or living unit members and guests, but not serving any type of multiple unit housing complex of four or more living units."(2)In ISPSC, Section 202, the definition for Residential Swimming Pool (Residential Pool) is deleted and replaced with the following:  "See the definition for Private Residential Swimming Pool (Residential Pool)."(3)In ISPSC, Section 306.3, in the first sentence, the words "or private residential pools" are added after the word "pools" and the last sentence is deleted.(3)(4)In ISPSC, Section 320.1Section 321.1, the following changes are made:(a)the words "or storm" are deleted;(b)the words "onsite waste water" are added before the word "disposal"; and(c)the words "or shall be disposed of by other means approved by the state or local authority" are deleted.(5)In ISPSC, Section 326.1, the following words are added after the word "indoor": "residential or."(6)In ISPSC, a new Section 326.2 is added as follows:"326.2 Recirculation of Air. Supply air to residential or public pool and spa and associated deck areas shall not be recirculated unless such air is dehumidified to maintain the relative humidity of the area at 60% or less. Air from this area shall not be recirculated to other spaces where more than 10% of the resulting supply airstream consists of air recirculated from these spaces. The design and installation of ventilation systems shall comply with ANSI/ACCA 10 Manual SPS.(7)In Chapter 11, the following reference standard is added:    Standard Reference NumberTitleReferenced in Code Section NumberANSI/ACCA 10 Manual SPS - 2023HVAC Design for Swimming Pools and Spas, Publisher: Air Conditioning Contractors of America (ACCA) 2800 Shirlington Road, Ste 300, Arlington, VA 22206Section 326.2

Section 26:
Section 26. Section 15A-6-102 is amended to read:15A-6-102Effective 07/01/26. Nitrogen Oxide emission limits for natural gas-fired water heaters.(1)As used in this section:(a)"BTU" means British Thermal Unit.(b)(i)"Heat input" means the heat of combustion released by fuel burned in a water heater based on the heating value of the fuel.(ii)"Heat input" does not include the enthalpy of a water heater's incoming combustion air.(c)"Heat output" means the enthalpy of a water heater's working fluid output.(d)"Natural gas-fired water heater" means a device that heats water:(i)using natural gas combustion;(ii)for use external to the device at a pressure that is less than or equal to 160 pounds per square inch gage; and(iii)to a thermostatically controlled temperature less than or equal to:(A)210 degrees Fahrenheit; or(B)99 degrees Celsius.(e)"Ozone nonattainment area" means an area that does not meet the primary or secondary air quality standards for ozone under the National Ambient Air Quality Standards described in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 7407(d).(f)"PM2.5 nonattainment area" means an area that does not meet the primary or secondary air quality standards for fine particulate matter, PM2.5, under the National Ambient Air Quality Standards described in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 7407(d).(e)(g)"ppm" means parts of Nitrogen Oxide per million parts of water heater air output.(f)(h)"Recreational vehicle" means the same as that term is defined in Section 13-14-102.(2)On and after July 1, 2018, aA person may not sell or install a natural gas-fired water heater with an emission rate greater than the following limits:(a)except as provided in Subsection (6), for a water heater that has a heat input of less than or equal to 75,000 BTU per hour that is not installed in a mobile home, a limit of:(i)10 nanograms per Joule of heat output; or(ii)15 ppm, corrected to 3% oxygen;(b)for a water heater that has a heat input of greater than 75,000 BTU per hour and less than 2,000,000 BTU per hour that is not installed in a mobile home, a limit of:(i)14 nanograms per Joule of heat output; or(ii)20 ppm, corrected to 3% oxygen;(c)for a water heater installed in a mobile home, a limit of:(i)40 nanograms per Joule of heat output; or(ii)55 ppm, corrected to 3% oxygen;(d)for a pool or spa water heater with a heat input that is less than or equal to 400,000 BTU per hour, a limit of:(i)40 nanograms per Joule of heat output; or(ii)55 ppm, corrected to 3% oxygen; and(e)for a pool or spa water heater with a heat input of greater than 400,000 BTU per hour and less than 2,000,000 BTU per hour, a limit of:(i)14 nanograms per Joule of heat output; or(ii)20 ppm, corrected to 3% oxygen.(3)A water heater manufacturer shall use California South Coast Air Quality Management District Method 100.1 to calculate the emissions rate of a water heater subject to this section.(4)A water heater manufacturer shall display on a water heater subject to this section, as a permanent label, the model number and the Nitrogen Oxide emission rate of the water heater.(5)The requirements of this section do not apply to:(a)a water heater using a fuel other than natural gas;(b)a water heater used in a recreational vehicle;(c)a water heater manufactured in the state for sale and shipment outside of the state; or(d)a water heater manufactured before July 1, 2018.; or(e)a water heater intended for installation in an area of Utah that is not included in an ozone nonattainment area or a PM2.5 nonattainment area.(6)A person may sell or install a natural gas-fired water heater with an emission rate greater than the limits established in Subsection (2)(a) if:(a)the water heater is replacing a water heater of equal BTUs per hour;(b)there is not available for purchase in the United States a water heater that:(i)has an input of equal BTUs per hour as the water heater being replaced; and(ii)meets the limits established in Subsection (2)(a); and(c)the purpose of the water heater is to heat water and provide space heating.

Section 27:
Section 27. Section 63I-2-210 is amended to read:63I-2-210Effective 07/01/26. Repeal dates: Title 10.(1)Subsection 10-2a-205(2)(b)(iii), regarding a feasibility study for the proposed incorporation of a community council area, is repealed July 1, 2028.(2)Section 10-2a-205.5, Additional feasibility consultant considerations for proposed incorporation of community council area -- Additional feasibility study requirements, is repealed July 1, 2028.(3)Subsection 10-20-904(4)(c), regarding an inspection fee on a qualified water conservancy district, is repealed July 1, 2026July 1, 2027.

Section 28:
Section 28. Section 63I-2-217 is amended to read:63I-2-217Effective 07/01/26. Repeal dates: Titles 17 through 17D.(1)Subsection 17-79-804(4)(c), regarding an inspection fee on a qualified water conservancy district, is repealed July 1, 2026July 1, 2027.(2)Subsection 17-62-102(3), regarding the process for changing a form of county government, is repealed January 1, 2028.(3)Subsections 17-62-203(10) through (12), regarding the process to create a districting commission and implementing a district map, are repealed July 1, 2029.

Section 29:
Section 29.  Effective Date.(1)Except as provided in Subsection (2), this bill takes effect July 1, 2026.(2)(a)The actions affecting sections described in Subsection (2)(b) take effect:(i)except as provided in Subsection (2)(a)(ii), May 6, 2026; or(ii)if approved by two-thirds of all members elected to each house:(A)upon approval by the governor;(B)without the governor's signature, the day following the constitutional time limit of Utah Constitution, Article VII, Section 8; or(C)in the case of a veto, the date of veto override.(b)Subsection (2)(a) applies to the actions affecting the following sections:(i)Section 15A-3-107Effective upon governor's approval; and(ii)Section 15A-3-108Effective upon governor's approval.